Illinois, session 104th, SB52.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4Article 5. General 5    Section 5-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Privacy Rights Act. 7    Section 5-5. Purpose and intent. In enacting this Act, it 8is the purpose and intent of the State to further protect 9consumers' rights, including the constitutional right of 10privacy. The implementation of this Act shall be guided by the 11following principles:12        (1) Consumers should know who is collecting their 13    personal information and that of their children, how it is 14    being used, and to whom it is disclosed so that they have 15    the information necessary to exercise meaningful control 16    over businesses' use of their personal information and 17    that of their children.18        (2) Consumers should be able to control the use of 19    their personal information, including limiting the use of 20    their sensitive personal information, the unauthorized use 21    or disclosure of which creates a heightened risk of harm 22    to the consumer, and they should have meaningful options   SB0052- 2 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    over how it is collected, used, and disclosed.2        (3) Consumers should have access to their personal 3    information and should be able to correct it, delete it, 4    and take it with them from one business to another.5        (4) Consumers or their authorized agents should be 6    able to exercise these options through easily accessible 7    self-serve tools.8        (5) Consumers should be able to exercise these rights 9    without being penalized for doing so.10        (6) Consumers should be able to hold businesses 11    accountable for failing to take reasonable precautions to 12    protect their most sensitive personal information from 13    hackers and security breaches.14        (7) Consumers should benefit from businesses' use of 15    their personal information.16        (8) The privacy interests of employees and independent 17    contractors should also be protected, taking into account 18    the differences in the relationship between employees or 19    independent contractors and businesses as compared to the 20    relationship between consumers and businesses. This Act is 21    not intended to interfere with the right to organize and 22    collective bargaining under the federal National Labor 23    Relations Act. 24        (9) Businesses should specifically and clearly inform 25    consumers about how they collect and use personal 26    information and how they can exercise their rights and   SB0052- 3 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    choice.2        (10) Businesses should only collect consumers' 3    personal information for specific, explicit, and 4    legitimate disclosed purposes and should not further 5    collect, use, or disclose consumers' personal information 6    for reasons incompatible with those purposes.7        (11) Businesses should collect consumers' personal 8    information only to the extent that it is relevant and 9    limited to what is necessary in relation to the purposes 10    for which it is being collected, used, and shared.11        (12) Businesses should provide consumers or their 12    authorized agents with easily accessible means to allow 13    consumers and their children to obtain their personal 14    information, to delete it or correct it, to opt out of its 15    sale and sharing across business platforms, services, 16    businesses, and devices, and to limit the use of their 17    sensitive personal information.18        (13) Businesses should not penalize consumers for 19    exercising these rights.20        (14) Businesses should take reasonable precautions to 21    protect consumers' personal information from a security 22    breach.23        (15) Businesses should be held accountable when they 24    violate consumers' privacy rights, and the penalties 25    should be higher when the violation affects children.26        (16) The rights of consumers and the responsibilities   SB0052- 4 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    of businesses should be implemented with the goal of 2    strengthening consumer privacy while giving attention to 3    the impact on business and innovation. Consumer privacy 4    and the development of beneficial new products and 5    services are not necessarily incompatible goals. Strong 6    consumer privacy rights create incentives to innovate and 7    develop new products that are privacy protective.8        (17) Businesses and consumers should be provided with 9    clear guidance about their responsibilities and rights.10        (18) The law should place the consumer in a position 11    to knowingly and freely negotiate with a business over the 12    business' use of the personal information.13        (19) The law should adjust to technological changes, 14    help consumers exercise their rights, and assist 15    businesses with compliance with the continuing goal of 16    strengthening consumer privacy.17        (20) The law should enable proconsumer new products 18    and services and promote efficiency of implementation for 19    business as long as the law does not compromise or weaken 20    consumer privacy.21        (21) The law should be amended, if necessary, to 22    improve its operation, as long as the amendments do not 23    compromise or weaken consumer privacy, while giving 24    attention to the impact on business and innovation.25        (22) Businesses should be held accountable for 26    violating the law through vigorous administrative and   SB0052- 5 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    civil enforcement.2        (23) To the extent it advances consumer privacy and 3    business compliance, the law should be compatible with 4    privacy laws in other jurisdictions. 5    Section 5-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:6    "Advertising and marketing" means a communication by a 7business or person acting on behalf of the business in any 8medium intended to induce a consumer to obtain goods, 9services, or employment.10    "Agency" means the Privacy Protection Agency.11    "Aggregate consumer information" means information that 12relates to a group or category of consumers, from which 13individual consumer identities have been removed, that is not 14linked or reasonably linkable to any consumer or household, 15including via a device. "Aggregate consumer information" does 16not include one or more individual consumer records that have 17been deidentified.18    "Biometric information" means an individual's 19physiological, biological, or behavioral characteristics, 20including information pertaining to an individual's 21deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA), that is used or is intended to be 22used singly or in combination with each other or with other 23identifying data, to establish individual identity. "Biometric 24information" includes, but is not limited to, imagery of the 25iris, retina, fingerprint, face, hand, palm, vein patterns,   SB0052- 6 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1and voice recordings, from which an identifier template, such 2as a faceprint, a minutiae template, or a voiceprint, can be 3extracted, and keystroke patterns or rhythms, gait patterns or 4rhythms, and sleep, health, or exercise data that contain 5identifying information.6    "Business" means:7        (1) a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited 8    liability company, corporation, association, or other 9    legal entity that is organized or operated for the profit 10    or financial benefit of its shareholders or other owners, 11    that collects consumers' personal information, or on the 12    behalf of which such information is collected and that 13    determines the purposes and means of the processing of 14    consumers' personal information, does business in this 15    State, and satisfies one or more of the following 16    thresholds:17            (A) as of January 1 of the calendar year, had 18        annual gross revenues in excess of $25,000,000 in the 19        preceding calendar year;20            (B) alone or in combination, annually, buys, 21        sells, or shares the personal information of 100,000 22        or more consumers or households; or23            (C) derives 50% or more of its annual revenues 24        from selling or sharing consumers' personal 25        information;26        (2) any entity that controls or is controlled by a   SB0052- 7 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    business and that shares common branding with the business 2    and with whom the business shares consumers' personal 3    information;4        (3) a joint venture or partnership composed of 5    businesses in which each business has at least a 40% 6    interest; or7        (4) a person that does business in this State, that is 8    not covered by paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this 9    definition and that voluntarily certifies to this Act that 10    it is in compliance with, and agrees to be bound by, this 11    Act.12    "Business associate" has the meaning given to that term in 13Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal 14Regulations.15    "Business controller information" means the name or names 16of the owner or owners, director, officer, or management 17employee of a business and the contact information, including 18a business title, for the owner or owners, director, officer, 19or management employee.20    "Business purpose" means the use of personal information 21for the business's operational purposes, or other notified 22purposes, or for the service provider's or contractor's 23operational purposes, as long as the use of personal 24information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to 25achieve the purpose for which the personal information was 26collected or processed or for another purpose that is   SB0052- 8 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1compatible with the context in which the personal information 2was collected. "Business purposes" includes:3        (1) auditing related to counting ad impressions to 4    unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad 5    impressions, and auditing compliance with this 6    specification and other standards;7        (2) helping to ensure security and integrity to the 8    extent the use of the personal information is reasonably 9    necessary and proportionate for these purposes;10        (3) debugging to identify and repair errors that 11    impair existing intended functionality;12        (4) short-term, transient use, including, but not 13    limited to, nonpersonalized advertising shown as part of a 14    consumer's current interaction with the business, as long 15    as the personal information is not disclosed to another 16    third party and is not used to build a profile about the 17    consumer or otherwise alter the consumer's experience 18    outside the current interaction with the business;19        (5) performing services on behalf of the business, 20    including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing 21    customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and 22    transactions, verifying customer information, processing 23    payments, providing financing, providing analytic 24    services, providing storage, or providing similar services 25    on behalf of the business;26        (6) providing advertising and marketing services,   SB0052- 9 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    except for cross-context behavioral advertising, to the 2    consumer, as long as a service provider or contractor does 3    not combine the personal information of consumers who 4    opted-out that the service provider or contractor receives 5    from, or on behalf of, the business with personal 6    information that the service provider or contractor 7    receives from, or on behalf of, another person or persons 8    or collects from its own interaction with consumers;9        (7) undertaking internal research for technological 10    development and demonstration; and11        (8) undertaking activities to verify or maintain the 12    quality or safety of a service or device that is owned, 13    manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by the 14    business, and to improve, upgrade, or enhance the service 15    or device that is owned, manufactured, manufactured for, 16    or controlled by the business.17    "Collects", "collected", or "collection" means buying, 18renting, gathering, obtaining, receiving, or accessing any 19personal information pertaining to the consumer by any means. 20"Collects", "collected", or "collection" includes receiving 21information from the consumer, either actively or passively, 22or by observing the consumer's behavior.23    "Commercial credit reporting agency" means any person who, 24for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, 25provides commercial credit reports to third parties.26    "Commercial purposes" means to advance a person's   SB0052- 10 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1commercial or economic interests, such as by inducing another 2person to buy, rent, lease, join, subscribe to, provide, or 3exchange products, goods, property, information, or services, 4or enabling or effecting, directly or indirectly, a commercial 5transaction.6    "Common branding" means a shared name, service mark, or 7trademark that the average consumer would understand that 2 or 8more entities are commonly owned.9    "Consent" means any freely given, specific, informed, and 10unambiguous indication of the consumer's wishes by which the 11consumer, the consumer's legal guardian, or a person who has 12power of attorney signifies agreement to the processing of 13personal information relating to the consumer for a narrowly 14defined particular purpose. "Consent" does not include 15acceptance of a general or broad terms of use, or similar 16document, that contains descriptions of personal information 17processing along with other, unrelated information, hovering 18over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content, or 19an agreement obtained through use of dark patterns.20    "Consumer" means a natural person who is a State resident, 21however identified, including by any unique identifier.22    "Contractor" means a person to whom the business makes 23available personal information for a business purpose, under 24the written contract with the business, if the contract:25        (1) prohibits the contractor from:26            (A) selling or sharing the personal information;  SB0052- 11 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1            (B) retaining, using, or disclosing the personal 2        information for any purpose other than for the 3        business purpose specified in the contract, including 4        retaining, using, or disclosing the personal 5        information for a commercial purpose other than the 6        business purposes specified in the contract, or as 7        otherwise permitted by this Act;8            (C) retaining, using, or disclosing the personal 9        information outside of the direct business 10        relationship between the contractor and the business; 11        and12            (D) combining the personal information that the 13        contractor receives under a written contract with the 14        business with personal information that it receives on 15        behalf of another person or persons, or collects from 16        its own interaction with the consumer;17        (2) includes a certification made by the contractor 18    that the contractor understands the restrictions in 19    paragraph (1) and will comply with them; and20        (3) permits, subject to agreement with the contractor, 21    the business to monitor the contractor's compliance with 22    the contract through measures, including, but not limited 23    to, ongoing manual reviews and automated scans and regular 24    assessments, audits, or other technical and operational 25    testing at least once every 12 months.26    "Control" or "controlled" means ownership of, or the power   SB0052- 12 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1to vote, more than 50% of the outstanding shares, control in 2any manner over the election of a majority of directors, or of 3individuals exercising similar functions, or the power to 4exercise a controlling influence over the management of the 5company.6    "Covered entity" has the meaning given to that term in 7Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal 8Regulations.9    "Cross-context behavioral advertising" means the targeting 10of advertising to a consumer based on the personal information 11obtained from the consumer's activity across businesses, 12distinctly branded websites, applications, or services, other 13than the business, distinctly branded website, application, or 14service with which the consumer intentionally interacts.15    "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or 16manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or 17impairing user autonomy, decision-making, or choice.18    "Deidentified" means information that cannot be reasonably 19used to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, a 20particular consumer if the business that possesses the 21information:22        (1) takes reasonable measures to ensure that the 23    information cannot be associated with a consumer or 24    household;25        (2) publicly commits to maintain and use the 26    information in deidentified form and not to attempt to   SB0052- 13 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    reidentify the information; and2        (3) contractually obligates any recipients of the 3    information to comply with all provisions of this 4    definition.5    "Designated methods for submitting requests" means a 6mailing address, email address, Internet webpage, Internet web 7portal, toll-free telephone number, or other applicable 8contact information, whereby consumers may submit a request or 9direction under this Act, and any new, consumer-friendly means 10of contacting a business.11    "Device" means any physical object that is capable of 12connecting to the Internet, directly or indirectly, or to 13another device.14    "Director" means a natural person designated in the 15articles of incorporation as director, or elected by the 16incorporators and natural persons designated, elected, or 17appointed by any other name or title to act as directors, and 18their successors.19    "Educational standardized assessment or educational 20assessment" means a standardized or nonstandardized quiz, 21test, or other assessment used to evaluate students in or for 22entry to kindergarten and grades 1 through 12, schools, 23postsecondary institutions, vocational programs, and 24postgraduate programs that are accredited by an accrediting 25agency or organization recognized by the State or the United 26States Department of Education, as well as certification and   SB0052- 14 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1licensure examinations used to determine competency and 2eligibility to receive certification or licensure from a 3government agency or government certification body. 4    "Family" means a custodial parent or guardian and any 5children under 18 years of age over which the parent or 6guardian has custody.7    "Fraudulent concealment" means the person knows of 8material facts related to the person's duties under this Act 9and knowingly conceals the facts in performing or omitting to 10perform those duties for the purpose of defrauding the public 11of information to which it is entitled under this Act.12    "Homepage" means the introductory page of an Internet 13website and any Internet webpage where personal information is 14collected. "Homepage", in the case of an online service such 15as a mobile application, means the application's platform page 16or download page, a link within the application, such as from 17the application configuration, "About", "Information", or 18settings page, and any other location that allows consumers to 19review the notices required by this Act, including, but not 20limited to, before downloading the application.21    "Household" means a group, however identified, of 22consumers who cohabitate with one another at the same 23residential address and share use of common devices or 24services.25    "Independent contractor" means a natural person who 26provides any service to a business under a written contract.  SB0052- 15 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    "Individually identifiable" means that the medical 2information includes or contains any element of personal 3identifying information sufficient to allow identification of 4the individual, such as the patient's name, address, email 5address, telephone number, or social security number, or other 6information that, alone or in combination with other publicly 7available information, reveals the identity of the individual.8    "Infer" or "inference" means the derivation of 9information, data, assumptions, or conclusions from facts, 10evidence, or other sources of information or data.11    "Insurance institution" means any corporation, 12association, partnership, reciprocal exchange, interinsurer, 13fraternal benefit society, or other person engaged in the 14business of insurance. "Insurance institution" does not 15include agents, insurance-support organizations, or health 16care service plans.17    "Intentionally interacts" means when the consumer intends 18to interact with a person, or disclose personal information to 19a person, via one or more deliberate interactions, including 20visiting the person's website or purchasing a good or service 21from the person. "Intentionally interacts" does not include 22hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of 23content.24    "Jeopardize the validity and reliability of that 25educational standardized assessment or educational assessment" 26means releasing information that would provide an advantage to   SB0052- 16 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1the consumer who has submitted a verifiable consumer request 2or to another natural person. 3    "Local educational agency" includes school districts, 4county offices of education, and charter schools.5    "Management employee" means a natural person whose name 6and contact information is reported to or collected by a 7commercial credit reporting agency as the primary manager of a 8business and used solely within the context of the natural 9person's role as the primary manager of the business.10    "Medical information" means any individually identifiable 11information, in electronic or physical form, in possession of 12or derived from a provider of health care, health care service 13plan, pharmaceutical company, or contractor regarding a 14patient's medical history, mental health application 15information, mental or physical condition, or treatment.16    "Medical staff member" means a licensed physician and 17surgeon, dentist, or podiatric physician, licensed under the 18Medical Practice Act of 1987, the Illinois Dental Practice 19Act, or the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987 and a 20clinical psychologist as defined in the Clinical Psychologist 21Licensing Act.22    "New motor vehicle dealer" is a dealer who either acquires 23for resale new and unregistered motor vehicles from 24manufacturers or distributors of those motor vehicles or 25acquires for resale new off-highway motorcycles or all-terrain 26vehicles from manufacturers or distributors of the vehicles.  SB0052- 17 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    "Nonpersonalized advertising" means advertising and 2marketing that is based solely on personal information derived 3from the consumer's current interaction with the business with 4the exception of the consumer's precise geolocation.5    "Officer" means a natural person elected or appointed by 6the board of directors to manage the daily operations of a 7corporation, including a chief executive officer, president, 8secretary, or treasurer.9    "Owner" means a natural person who:10        (1) has ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 11    50% of the outstanding shares of any class of voting 12    security of a business;13        (2) has control in any manner over the election of a 14    majority of the directors or of individuals exercising 15    similar functions; or16        (3) has the power to exercise a controlling influence 17    over the management of a company.18    "Ownership information" means the name or names of and 19contact information for the registered owner or owners.20    "Person" means an individual, proprietorship, firm, 21partnership, joint venture, syndicate, business, trust, 22company, corporation, limited liability company, association, 23committee, and any other organization or group of persons 24acting in concert.25    "Personal information" means information that identifies, 26relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being   SB0052- 18 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or 2indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. "Personal 3information" includes, but is not limited to, the following if 4it identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of 5being associated with, or could be reasonably linked, directly 6or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household:7        (1) identifiers such as a real name, alias, postal 8    address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, 9    Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, 10    social security number, driver's license number, passport 11    number, or other similar identifiers;12        (2) any information, including, but not limited to, 13    signature, physical characteristics or description, 14    address, telephone number, state identification card 15    number, insurance policy number, education, bank account 16    number, credit card number, debit card number, or any 17    other financial information, medical information, or 18    health insurance information, but does not include 19    publicly available information that is lawfully made 20    available to the general public from federal, State, or 21    local government records;22        (3) characteristics of protected classifications under 23    State or federal law;24        (4) commercial information, including records of 25    personal property, products or services purchased, 26    obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming   SB0052- 19 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    histories or tendencies;2        (5) biometric information;3        (6) Internet or other electronic network activity 4    information, including, but not limited to, browsing 5    history, search history, and information regarding a 6    consumer's interaction with an Internet website, 7    application, or advertisement;8        (7) geolocation data;9        (8) audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or 10    similar information;11        (9) professional or employment-related information;12        (10) education information that is not publicly 13    available, personally identifiable information as defined 14    in the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act;15        (11) inferences drawn from any of the information 16    identified in this definition to create a profile about a 17    consumer to reflect the consumer's preferences, 18    characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, 19    behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and 20    aptitudes; or21        (12) sensitive personal information.22"Personal information" does not include publicly available 23information or lawfully obtained, truthful information that is 24a matter of public concern, consumer information that is 25deidentified, or aggregate consumer information.26    "Precise geolocation" means any data that is derived from   SB0052- 20 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1a device and that is used or intended to be used to locate a 2consumer within a geographic area that is equal to or less than 3the area of a circle with a radius of 1,850 feet, except as 4prescribed by rules.5    "Processing" means any operation or set of operations that 6are performed on personal information or on sets of personal 7information, whether by automated means.8    "Profiling" means any form of automated processing of 9personal information to evaluate certain personal aspects 10relating to a natural person and in particular to analyze or 11predict aspects concerning that natural person's performance 12at work, economic situation, health, personal preferences, 13interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.14    "Protected health information" has the meaning given to 15that term in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal 16Regulations.17    "Provider of health care" means a person licensed or 18certified under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, the Nurse 19Practice Act, the Illinois Dental Practice Act, the Podiatric 20Medical Practice Act of 1987, the Illinois Speech-Language 21Pathology and Audiology Practice Act, the Illinois 22Occupational Therapy Practice Act, the Dietitian Nutritionist 23Practice Act, the Perfusionist Practice Act, the Illinois 24Physical Therapy Act, the Licensed Certified Professional 25Midwife Practice Act, the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, 26the Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987, the Physician   SB0052- 21 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1Assistant Practice Act of 1987, the Respiratory Care Practice 2Act, the Pharmacy Practice Act, the Massage Therapy Practice 3Act, the Music Therapy Licensing and Practice Act, the 4Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004, the 5Acupuncture Practice Act, the Marriage and Family Therapy 6Licensing Act, the Behavior Analyst Licensing Act, the 7Clinical Social Work and Social Work Practice Act, and the 8Professional Counselor and Clinical Professional Counselor 9Licensing and Practice Act or a clinic, health dispensary, or 10health facility licensed under the Community Living Facilities 11Licensing Act, the Home Health, Home Services, and Home 12Nursing Agency Licensing Act, the Hospice Program Licensing 13Act, and the Hospital Licensing Act. "Provider of health care" 14does not include insurance institutions.15    "Pseudonymize" or "pseudonymization" means the processing 16of personal information in a manner that renders the personal 17information no longer attributable to a specific consumer 18without the use of additional information, as long as the 19additional information is kept separately and is subject to 20technical and organizational measures to ensure that the 21personal information is not attributed to an identified or 22identifiable consumer.23    "Publicly available" means information that is lawfully 24made available from federal, State, or local government 25records, information that a business has a reasonable basis to 26believe is lawfully made available to the general public by   SB0052- 22 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1the consumer or from widely distributed media or information 2made available by a person to whom the consumer has disclosed 3the information if the consumer has not restricted the 4information to a specific audience. "Publicly available" does 5not include biometric information collected by a business 6about a consumer without the consumer's knowledge.7    "Research" means scientific analysis, systematic study, 8and observation, including basic research or applied research 9that is designed to develop or contribute to public or 10scientific knowledge and that adheres or otherwise conforms to 11all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, including, but 12not limited to, studies conducted in the public interest in 13the area of public health. 14    "Security and integrity" means the ability of:15        (1) networks or information systems to detect security 16    incidents that compromise the availability, authenticity, 17    integrity, and confidentiality of stored or transmitted 18    personal information;19        (2) businesses to detect security incidents, resist 20    malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal actions and 21    to help prosecute those responsible for those actions; and22        (3) businesses to ensure the physical safety of 23    natural persons.24    "Sell", "selling", "sale", or "sold" means selling, 25renting, releasing, disclosing, disseminating, making 26available, transferring, or otherwise communicating orally, in   SB0052- 23 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1writing, or by electronic or other means personal information 2by the business to a third party for monetary or other valuable 3consideration.4    "Sensitive personal information" means:5        (1) personal information that reveals:6            (A) a consumer's social security, driver's 7        license, state identification card, or passport 8        number;9            (B) a consumer's account log-in, financial 10        account, debit card, or credit card number in 11        combination with any required security or access code, 12        password, or credentials allowing access to an 13        account;14            (C) a consumer's precise geolocation;15            (D) a consumer's racial or ethnic origin, 16        religious or philosophical beliefs, or union 17        membership;18            (E) the contents of a consumer's mail, email, or 19        text messages unless the business is the intended 20        recipient of the communication; or21            (F) a consumer's genetic data;22        (2) the processing of biometric information for the 23    purpose of uniquely identifying a consumer;24        (3) personal information collected and analyzed 25    concerning a consumer's health; or26        (4) personal information collected and analyzed   SB0052- 24 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    concerning a consumer's sex life or sexual orientation. 2"Sensitive personal information" does not include sensitive 3personal information that is publicly available.4    "Service" or "services" means work, labor, and services, 5including services furnished in connection with the sale or 6repair of goods.7    "Service provider" means a person that processes personal 8information on behalf of a business and that receives from or 9on behalf of the business personal information for a business 10purpose under a written contract, as long as the contract 11prohibits the person from:12        (1) selling or sharing the personal information;13        (2) retaining, using, or disclosing the personal 14    information for any purpose other than for the specific 15    business purposes specified in the contract for the 16    business, including retaining, using, or disclosing the 17    personal information for a commercial purpose other than 18    the business purposes specified in the contract with the 19    business, or as otherwise permitted by this Act;20        (3) retaining, using, or disclosing the personal 21    information outside of the direct business relationship 22    between the service provider and the business; or23        (4) combining the personal information that the 24    service provider receives from, or on behalf of, the 25    business with personal information that it receives from, 26    or on behalf of, another person or persons, or collects   SB0052- 25 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    from its own interaction with the consumer.2    "Share", "shared", or "sharing" means sharing, renting, 3releasing, disclosing, disseminating, making available, 4transferring, or otherwise communicating orally, in writing, 5or by electronic or other means personal information by the 6business to a third party for cross-context behavioral 7advertising, whether for monetary or other valuable 8consideration, including transactions between a business and a 9third party for cross-context behavioral advertising for the 10benefit of a business in which no money is exchanged.11    "Third party" means a person who is not:12        (1) the business with whom the consumer intentionally 13    interacts and that collects personal information from the 14    consumer as part of the consumer's current interaction 15    with the business under this Act;16        (2) a service provider to the business; or17        (3) a contractor.18    "Unique identifier" or "unique personal identifier" means 19a persistent identifier that can be used to recognize a 20consumer, family, or device that is linked to a consumer or 21family, over time and across different services, including, 22but not limited to, a device identifier, Internet Protocol 23address, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers, 24or similar technology, customer number, unique pseudonym, or 25user alias, telephone numbers, or other forms of persistent or 26probabilistic identifiers that can be used to identify a   SB0052- 26 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1particular consumer or device that is linked to a consumer or 2family.3    "Vehicle information" means the vehicle information 4number, make, model, year, and odometer reading.5    "Vehicle manufacturer" means any person who produces from 6raw materials or new basic components a vehicle of a type 7subject to registration, off-highway motorcycles or 8all-terrain vehicles subject to identification, or trailers 9subject to identification, or who permanently alters, for 10purposes of retail sales, new commercial vehicles by 11converting the vehicles into house cars.12    "Verifiable consumer request" means a request that is made 13by a consumer, by a consumer on behalf of the consumer's minor 14child, by a natural person or a person registered with the 15Secretary of State authorized by the consumer to act on the 16consumer's behalf, or by a person who has power of attorney, 17and that the business can reasonably verify, using 18commercially reasonable methods to be the consumer about whom 19the business has collected personal information. 20    Section 5-15. Miscellaneous provisions.21    (a) The joint venture or partnership and each business 22that composes the joint venture or partnership shall 23separately be considered a single business, except that 24personal information in the possession of each business and 25disclosed to the joint venture or partnership shall not be   SB0052- 27 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1shared with the other business.2    (b) A contractor may combine personal information to 3perform any business purpose, except as provided for in 4paragraph (6) of the definition of business purposes and in 5rules adopted by the Agency.6    (c) If a contractor engages any other person to assist it 7in processing personal information for a business purpose on 8behalf of that business, or if any other person engaged by the 9contractor engages another person to assist in processing 10personal information for that business purposes, it shall 11notify the business of that engagement, and the engagement 12shall be under a written contract binding the other person to 13observe all of the requirements set forth in the definition of 14contractor.15    (d) A business may attempt to reidentify the deindentified 16personal information solely for the purpose of determining 17whether its deidentification processes satisfies the 18requirements of the definition of deidentified.19    (e) Research with personal information that may have been 20collected from a consumer in the course of consumer's 21interactions with a business's service or device for other 22purposes shall be:23        (1) compatible with the business purpose for which the 24    personal information was collected;25        (2) subsequently pseudonymized and deidentified, or 26    deidentified and in the aggregate, such that the   SB0052- 28 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    information cannot reasonably identify, relate to, 2    describe, be capable of being associated with, or be 3    linked, directly or indirectly, to a particular consumer, 4    by a business;5        (3) made subject to technical safeguards that prohibit 6    reidentification of the consumer to whom the information 7    may pertain, other than as needed to support the research;8        (4) subject to business processes that specifically 9    prohibit reidentification of the information, other than 10    as needed to support the research;11        (5) made subject to business processes to prevent 12    inadvertent release of deidentified information;13        (6) protected from any reidentification attempts;14        (7) used solely for research purposes that are 15    compatible with the context in which the personal 16    information was collected; and17        (8) subjected by the business conducting the research 18    to additional security controls that limit access to the 19    research data to only those individuals as are necessary 20    to carry out the research purpose.21    (f) A business that does not sell or share personal 22information when:23        (1) a consumer uses or directs the business to 24    intentionally:25            (A) disclose personal information; or26            (B) interact with one or more third parties;  SB0052- 29 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        (2) the business uses or shares an identifier for a 2    consumer who has opted-out of the sale of personal 3    information or limited the use of sensitive personal 4    information for the purposes of altering persons that the 5    consumer has opted-out of the sale of personal information 6    or limited the use of sensitive personal information; or7        (3) the business transfers to a third party the 8    personal information as an asset that is part of a merger, 9    acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction in which the 10    third party assumes control of all or part of the 11    business, as long as that personal information is used or 12    shared consistently with this Act. If a third party 13    materially alters how it uses or shares the personal 14    information in a manner that is materially inconsistent 15    with the promises made at the time of collection, it shall 16    provide prior notice of the new or changed practice to the 17    consumer. The notice shall be sufficiently prominent and 18    robust to ensure that existing consumers can easily 19    exercise their choices consistently with this Act. This 20    paragraph does not authorize a business to make material, 21    retroactive privacy policy changes or make other changes 22    in their privacy policy in a manner that would violate the 23    Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act.24    (g) A service provider may combine personal information to 25perform any business purpose, except as provided for in 26paragraph (6) of the definition of business purpose in Section   SB0052- 30 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b15-10 and in rules adopted by the Agency. The contract may, 2subject to agreement with the service provider, permit the 3business to monitor the service provider's compliance with the 4contract through measures, including, but not limited to, 5ongoing manual reviews and automated scans and regular 6assessments, audits, or other technical and operational 7testing at least once every 12 months.8    (h) If a service provider engages any other person to 9assist it in processing personal information for a business 10purpose on behalf of the business, or if any other person 11engaged by the service provider engages another person to 12assist in processing personal information for that business 13purpose, it shall notify the business of that engagement, and 14the engagement shall be under a written contract binding the 15other person to observe all the requirements set forth in the 16definition of service provider.17    (i) A business is not obligated to provide information to 18the consumer under Sections 10-20 and 10-25 to delete personal 19information or to correct inaccurate personal information, if 20the business cannot verify that the consumer making the 21request is the consumer about whom the business has collected 22information or is a person authorized by the consumer to act on 23such consumer's behalf. 24Article 10. Personal Information   SB0052- 31 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    Section 10-5. General duties of businesses that collect 2personal information.3    (a) A business that controls the collection of personal 4information shall, at or before the point of collection, 5inform consumers of:6        (1) the categories of personal information to be 7    collected and the purposes for which the categories of 8    personal information are collected or used and whether 9    that information is sold or shared. A business shall not 10    collect additional categories of personal information or 11    use personal information collected for additional purposes 12    that are incompatible with the disclosed purpose for which 13    the personal information was collected without providing 14    the consumer with notice consistent with this Section15        (2) if the business collects sensitive personal 16    information, the categories of sensitive personal 17    information to be collected and the purposes for which the 18    categories of sensitive personal information to be 19    collected. A business shall not collect additional 20    categories of sensitive personal information or use 21    sensitive personal information collected for additional 22    purposes that are incompatible with the disclosed purpose 23    for which the sensitive personal information was collected 24    without providing the consumer with notice consistent with 25    this Section; and26        (3) the length of time the business intends to retain   SB0052- 32 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    each category of personal information, including sensitive 2    personal information, or, if that is not possible, the 3    criteria used to determine that period provided that a 4    business shall not retain personal information or 5    sensitive personal information for each disclosed purpose 6    for which the personal information was collected for 7    longer than is reasonably necessary for that disclosed 8    purpose.9    (b) A business that, acting as a third party, controls the 10collection of personal information may satisfy its obligation 11under subsection (a) by providing the required information 12prominently and conspicuously on the homepage of its Internet 13website. If a business acting as a third party controls the 14collection of personal information on its premises, including 15in a vehicle, then the business shall, at or before the point 16of collection, inform consumers as to the categories of 17personal information to be collected and the purposes for 18which the categories of personal information are used, and 19whether that personal information is sold, in a clear and 20conspicuous manner at the location.21    (c) Collection, use, retention, and sharing of personal 22information by a business shall be reasonably necessary and 23proportionate to achieve the purposes for which the personal 24information was collected or processed, or for another 25disclosed purpose that is compatible with the context in which 26the personal information was collected, and not further   SB0052- 33 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1processed in a manner that is incompatible with those 2purposes.3    (d) A business that collects personal information and that 4sells that personal information to, or shares it with, a third 5party or that discloses it to a service provider or contractor 6for a business purpose shall enter into an agreement with the 7third party, service provider, or contractor that:8        (1) specifies that the personal information is sold or 9    disclosed by the business only for limited and specified 10    purposes;11        (2) obligates the third party, service provider, or 12    contractor to comply with applicable obligations under 13    this Act and obligate those persons to provide the same 14    level of privacy protection as is required under this Act;15        (3) grants the business rights to take reasonable and 16    appropriate steps to help ensure that the third party, 17    service provider, or contractor uses the personal 18    information transferred in a manner consistent with the 19    obligations of the business under this Act;20        (4) requires the third party, service provider, or 21    contractor to notify the business if it makes a 22    determination that it can no longer meet its obligations 23    under this Act; and24        (5) grants the business the right, upon notice, to 25    take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and 26    remediate unauthorized use of personal information.  SB0052- 34 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    (e) A business that collects personal information shall 2implement reasonable security procedures and practices 3appropriate to the nature of the personal information to 4protect the personal information from unauthorized or illegal 5access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.6    (f) Nothing in this Section shall require a business to 7disclose trade secrets. 8    Section 10-10. Right to delete personal information.9    (a) A consumer shall have the right to request that a 10business delete any personal information about the consumer 11which the business has collected from the consumer.12    (b) A business that collects personal information shall 13disclose the consumer's rights to request the deletion of the 14personal information.15    (c) A business that receives a verifiable consumer request 16from a consumer to delete the personal information under 17subsection (a) shall delete the personal information from its 18records, notify any service providers or contractors to delete 19the personal information from their records, and notify all 20third parties to whom the business has sold or shared the 21personal information to delete the personal information unless 22this proves impossible or involves disproportionate effort. 23    The business may maintain a confidential record of 24deletion requests solely for the purpose of preventing the 25personal information of a consumer who has submitted a   SB0052- 35 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1deletion request from being sold, for compliance with laws or 2for other purposes, solely to the extent permissible under 3this Act.4    A service provider or contractor shall cooperate with the 5business in responding to a verifiable consumer request, and, 6at the direction of the business, shall delete, or enable the 7business to delete, and notify any of its own service 8providers or contractors to delete the personal information 9collected, used, processed, or retained by the service 10provider or contractor. The service provider or contractor 11shall notify any service providers, contractors, or third 12parties who may have accessed personal information from or 13through the service provider or contractor, unless the 14information was accessed at the direction of the business, to 15delete the personal information unless this proves impossible 16or involves disproportionate effort. A service provider or 17contractor shall not be required to comply with a deletion 18request submitted by the consumer directly to the service 19provider or contractor to the extent that the service provider 20or contractor has collected, used, processed, or retained the 21personal information in its role as a service provider or 22contractor to the business.23    (d) A business, or a service provider or contractor acting 24under its contract with the business, shall not be required to 25comply with a consumer's request to delete personal 26information if it is reasonably necessary for the business,   SB0052- 36 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1service provider, or contractor to maintain the personal 2information in order to:3        (1) complete the transaction for which the personal 4    information was collected, fulfill the terms of a written 5    warranty or product recall conducted in accordance with 6    federal law, provide a good or service requested by the 7    consumer, or reasonably anticipate an ongoing business 8    relationship with the consumer, or otherwise perform a 9    contract between the business and the consumer;10        (2) help to ensure security and integrity to the 11    extent the use of the personal information is reasonably 12    necessary and proportionate for those purposes;13        (3) debug to identify and repair errors that impair 14    existing intended functionality;15        (4) exercise free speech, ensure the right of another 16    consumer to exercise that consumer's right of free speech, 17    or exercise another right provided for by law;18        (5) comply with the Protecting Household Privacy Act;19        (6) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, 20    historical, or statistical research that conforms or 21    adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, 22    when the deletion of the information is likely to render 23    impossible or seriously impair the ability to complete 24    such research, if the consumer has provided informed 25    consent;26        (7) to enable solely internal uses that are reasonably   SB0052- 37 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    aligned with the expectations of the consumer based on the 2    consumer's relationship with the business and compatible 3    with the context in which the consumer provided the 4    information; or5        (8) comply with a legal obligation. 6    Section 10-15. Right to correct inaccurate personal 7information.8    (a) A consumer shall have the right to request a business 9that maintains inaccurate personal information about the 10consumer to correct that inaccurate personal information, 11taking into account the nature of the personal information and 12the purposes of the processing of the personal information.13    (b) A business that collects personal information shall 14disclose the consumer's right to request correction of 15inaccurate personal information.16    (c) A business that receives a verifiable consumer request 17to correct inaccurate personal information shall use 18commercially reasonable efforts to correct the inaccurate 19personal information as directed by the consumer. 20    Section 10-20. Right to know what personal information is 21being collected; right to access personal information.22    (a) A consumer shall have the right to request that a 23business that collects personal information about the consumer 24disclose to the consumer:  SB0052- 38 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        (1) the categories of personal information it has 2    collected about the consumer;3        (2) the categories of sources from which the personal 4    information is collected;5        (3) the business or commercial purpose for collecting, 6    selling, or sharing personal information;7        (4) the categories of third parties to whom the 8    business discloses personal information; and9        (5) the specific pieces of personal information it has 10    collected about that consumer.11    (b) A business that collects personal information shall 12disclose to the consumer the information specified in 13subsection (a) upon receipt of a verifiable consumer request 14from the consumer.15    (c) A business that collects personal information shall 16disclose that a consumer has the right to request the specific 17pieces of information the business has collected about that 18consumer. 19    Section 10-25. Right to know what personal information is 20sold or shared and to whom.21    (a) A consumer shall have the right to request that a 22business that sells or shares personal information, or that 23discloses personal information for a business purpose, 24disclose to that consumer:25        (1) the categories of personal information that the   SB0052- 39 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    business collected about the consumer;2        (2) the categories of personal information that the 3    business sold or shared about the consumer and the 4    categories of third parties to whom the personal 5    information was sold or shared, by category or categories 6    of personal information for each category of third parties 7    to whom the personal information was sold or shared; and8        (3) the categories of personal information that the 9    business disclosed about the consumer for a business 10    purpose and the categories of persons to whom it was 11    disclosed for a business purpose.12    (b) A business that sells or shares personal information, 13or that discloses personal information for a business purpose, 14shall disclose the personal information specified in 15subsection (a) to the consumer upon receipt of a verifiable 16consumer request from the consumer.17    (c) A business that sells or shares personal information, 18or that discloses personal information for a business purpose, 19shall disclose:20        (1) the category or categories of personal information 21    it has sold or shared, or if the business has not sold or 22    shared personal information, it shall disclose that fact; 23    and24        (2) the category or categories of personal information 25    it has disclosed for a business purpose, or if the 26    business has not disclosed personal information for a   SB0052- 40 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    business purpose, it shall disclose that fact.2    (d) A third party shall not sell or share personal 3information that has been sold to, or shared with, the third 4party by a business unless the consumer has received explicit 5notice and is provided an opportunity to exercise the right to 6opt out. 7    Section 10-30. Right to opt out of sale or sharing of 8personal information.9    (a) A consumer shall have the right, at any time, to direct 10a business that sells or shares personal information to third 11parties not to sell or share the personal information. This 12right may be referred to as the right to opt out of sale or 13sharing.14    (b) A business that sells personal information to, or 15shares it with, third parties shall provide notice to 16consumers that this information may be sold or shared and that 17consumers have the right to opt out of the sale or sharing of 18their personal information.19    (c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a business shall not 20sell or share the personal information of consumers if the 21business has actual knowledge that the consumer is less than 2216 years of age, unless the consumer, in the case of consumers 23at least 13 years of age and less than 16 years of age, or the 24consumer's parent or guardian in the case of consumers who are 25less than 13 years of age, has affirmatively authorized the   SB0052- 41 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1sale or sharing of the personal information. A business that 2willfully disregards the consumer's age shall be deemed to 3have had actual knowledge of the consumer's age.4    (d) A business that has received direction from a consumer 5not to sell or share personal information or, in the case of a 6minor consumer's personal information has not received consent 7to sell or share the minor consumer's personal information, 8shall be prohibited from selling or sharing the personal 9information after its receipt of the consumer's direction, 10unless the consumer subsequently provides consent, for the 11sale or sharing of the personal information. 12    Section 10-35. Right to limit use and disclosure of 13sensitive personal information.14    (a) A consumer shall have the right, at any time, to direct 15a business that collects sensitive personal information to 16limit its use of the sensitive personal information to that 17use which is necessary to perform the services or provide the 18goods reasonably expected by an average consumer who requests 19those goods or services, to perform the services set forth in 20paragraphs (2), (4), (5), and (8) in the definition of 21business purpose in Section 5-10, and as authorized by rule. A 22business that uses or discloses sensitive personal information 23for purposes other than those specified in this subsection 24shall provide notice to consumers that this information may be 25used, or disclosed to a service provider or contractor, for   SB0052- 42 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1additional, specified purposes and that consumers have the 2right to limit the use or disclosure of their sensitive 3personal information.4    (b) A business that has received direction from a consumer 5not to use or disclose the sensitive personal information, 6except as authorized under subsection (a), shall be prohibited 7from using or disclosing the sensitive personal information 8for any other purpose after its receipt of the consumer's 9direction unless the consumer subsequently provides consent 10for the use or disclosure of the sensitive personal 11information for additional purposes.12    (c) A service provider or contractor that assists a 13business in performing the purposes authorized by subsection 14(a) may not use the sensitive personal information after it 15has received instructions from the business and to the extent 16it has actual knowledge that the sensitive personal 17information is sensitive personal information for any other 18purpose. A service provider or contractor is only required to 19limit its use of sensitive personal information received under 20a written contract with the business in response to 21instructions from the business and only with respect to its 22relationship with that business.23    (d) Sensitive personal information that is collected or 24processed without the purpose of inferring characteristics 25about a consumer is not subject to this Section, as further 26defined by rule, and shall be treated as personal information.   SB0052- 43 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    Section 10-40. Right of no retaliation following opt-out 2or exercise of other rights.3    (a) A business shall not discriminate against a consumer 4because the consumer exercised any of the consumer's rights 5under this Act, including, but not limited to:6        (1) denying goods or services to the consumer;7        (2) charging different prices or rates for goods or 8    services, including through the use of discounts or other 9    benefits or imposing penalties;10        (3) providing a different level or quality of goods or 11    services to the consumer; or12        (4) suggesting that the consumer will receive a 13    different price or rate for goods or services or a 14    different level or quality of goods or services.15    A business shall not retaliate against an employee 16applicant for employment, or independent contractor for 17exercising their rights under this Act.18    Nothing in this subsection prohibits a business from 19charging a consumer a different price or rate, or from 20providing a different level or quality of goods or services, 21to the consumer if that difference is reasonably related to 22the value provided to the business by the consumer's data.23    This subsection does not prohibit a business from offering 24loyalty, rewards, premium features, discounts, or club card 25programs consistent with this Act.  SB0052- 44 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    (b) A business may offer financial incentives, including 2payments to consumers as compensation, for the collection of 3personal information, or the retention of personal 4information. A business may also offer a different price, 5rate, level, or quality of goods or services to the consumer if 6that price or difference is reasonably related to the value 7provided to the business by the consumer's data.8    A business that offers any financial incentives under this 9subsection shall notify consumers of the financial incentives 10under Section 10-45.11    A business may enter a consumer into a financial incentive 12program only if the consumer gives the business prior opt-in 13consent based on clearly described material terms of the 14financial incentive program, which may be revoked by the 15consumer at any time. If a consumer refuses to provide opt-in 16consent, then the business shall wait for at least 12 months 17before next requesting that the consumer provide opt-in 18consent, or as prescribed by rules.19    A business shall not use financial incentive practices 20that are unjust, unreasonable, coercive, or usurious in 21nature. 22    Section 10-45. Notice, disclosure, correction, and 23deletion requirements.24    (a) In order to comply with Sections 10-5, 10-10, 10-15, 2510-20, 10-25, and 10-45, a business shall, in a form that is   SB0052- 45 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1reasonably accessible to consumers:2        (1) (A) make available to consumers 2 or more 3    designated methods for submitting requests for information 4    required to be disclosed under Sections 10-20 and 10-25 or 5    requests for deletion or correction under Sections 10-10 6    and 10-15, including, at a minimum, a toll-free telephone 7    number. A business that operates exclusively online and 8    has a direct relationship with a consumer from whom it 9    collects personal information shall only be required to 10    provide an email address for submitting requests for 11    information required to be disclosed under Sections 10-20 12    and 10-25;13        (B) if the business maintains an Internet website, 14    make the internet website available to consumers to submit 15    requests for information required to be disclosed under 16    Sections 10-20 and 10-25 or requests for deletion or 17    correction under Sections 10-10 and 10-15;18        (2) disclose and deliver the required information to a 19    consumer free of charge, correct inaccurate personal 20    information, or delete personal information, based on the 21    consumer's request, within 45 days of receiving a 22    verifiable consumer request from the consumer. The 23    business shall promptly take steps to determine whether 24    the request is a verifiable consumer request, but this 25    shall not extend the business's duty to disclose and 26    deliver the information, correct inaccurate personal   SB0052- 46 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    information, or delete personal information within 45 days 2    of receipt of the consumer's request. The period to 3    provide the required information, correct inaccurate 4    personal information, or delete personal information may 5    be extended once by an additional 45 days when reasonably 6    necessary, as long as the consumer is provided notice of 7    the extension within the first 45-day period. The 8    disclosure of the required information shall be made in 9    writing and delivered through the consumer's account with 10    the business, if the consumer maintains an account with 11    the business, or by mail or electronically at the 12    consumer's option if the consumer does not maintain an 13    account with the business, in a readily usable format that 14    allows the consumer to transmit this information from one 15    entity to another entity without hindrance. The business 16    may require authentication of the consumer that is 17    reasonable in light of the nature of the personal 18    information requested, but shall not require the consumer 19    to create an account with the business in order to make a 20    verifiable consumer request. If the consumer has an 21    account with the business, the business may require the 22    consumer to use that account to submit a verifiable 23    consumer request.24        The disclosure of the required information shall cover 25    the 12-month period preceding the business' receipt of the 26    verifiable consumer request. Upon the adoption of a rule   SB0052- 47 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    under Section 10-75, a consumer may request that the 2    business disclose the required information beyond the 3    12-month period, and the business shall be required to 4    provide that information unless doing so proves impossible 5    or would involve a disproportionate effort. A consumer's 6    right to request required information beyond the 12-month 7    period, and a business's obligation to provide that 8    information, shall only apply to personal information 9    collected on or after January 1, 2026. Nothing in this 10    subparagraph shall require a business to keep personal 11    information for any length of time;12        (3) a business that receives a verifiable consumer 13    request under Section 10-20 or 10-25, disclose any 14    personal information it has collected about a consumer, 15    directly or indirectly, including through or by a service 16    provider or contractor, to the consumer. A service 17    provider or contractor shall not be required to comply 18    with a verifiable consumer request received directly from 19    a consumer or consumer's authorized agent under Section 20    10-20 or 10-25 to the extent that the service provider or 21    contractor has collected personal information about the 22    consumer in its role as a service provider or contractor. 23    A service provider or contractor shall provide assistance 24    to a business with which it has a contractual relationship 25    with respect to the business's response to a verifiable 26    consumer request, including, but not limited to, by   SB0052- 48 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    providing to the business the personal information in the 2    service provider's or contractor's possession that the 3    service provider or contractor obtained as a result of 4    providing services to the business and by correcting 5    inaccurate information or by enabling the business to do 6    the same. A service provider or contractor that collects 7    personal information under a written contract with a 8    business shall be required to assist the business through 9    appropriate technical and organizational measures in 10    complying with the requirements of subsections (d) through 11    (f) of Section 10-5, taking into account the nature of the 12    processing.13        (4) for purposes of subsection (b) of Section 10-20:14            (A) to identify the consumer, associate the 15        information provided to the consumer in the verifiable 16        consumer request to any personal information 17        previously collected by the business about the 18        consumer;19            (B) identify by category or categories the 20        personal information collected about the consumer for 21        the applicable period by reference to the enumerated 22        category or categories in subsection (c) that most 23        closely describes the personal information collected, 24        the categories of sources from which the personal 25        information was collected, the business or commercial 26        purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing the   SB0052- 49 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        personal information, and the categories of third 2        parties to whom the business discloses the personal 3        information; and4            (C) provide the specific pieces of personal 5        information obtained from the consumer in a format 6        that is easily understandable to the average consumer, 7        and to the extent technically feasible, in a 8        structured, commonly used, machine-readable format 9        that may also be transmitted to another entity at the 10        consumer's request without hindrance. Specific pieces 11        of personal information do not include data generated 12        to help ensure security and integrity or as prescribed 13        by rule. Personal information is not considered to 14        have been disclosed by a business when a consumer 15        instructs a business to transfer the personal 16        information from one business to another in the 17        context of switching services;18        (5) for purposes of subsection (b) of Section 10-25:19            (A) identify the consumer and associate the 20        information provided by the consumer in the verifiable 21        consumer request to any personal information 22        previously collected by the business about the 23        consumer;24            (B) identify by category or categories the 25        personal information of the consumer that the business 26        sold or shared during the applicable period by   SB0052- 50 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        reference to the enumerated category in subsection (c) 2        that most closely describes the personal information, 3        and provide the categories of third parties to whom 4        the personal information was sold or shared during the 5        applicable period by reference to the enumerated 6        category or categories in subsection (c) that most 7        closely describes the personal information sold or 8        shared. The business shall disclose the information in 9        a list that is separate from a list generated under 10        subparagraph (C); and11            (C) identify by category or categories the 12        personal information of the consumer that the business 13        disclosed for a business purpose during the applicable 14        period by reference to the enumerated category or 15        categories in subsection (c) that most closely 16        describes the personal information, and provide the 17        categories of persons to whom the personal information 18        was disclosed for a business purpose during the 19        applicable period by reference to the enumerated 20        category or categories in subsection (c) that most 21        closely describes the personal information disclosed. 22        The business shall disclose the information in a list 23        that is separate from a list generated under 24        subparagraph (B);25        (6) disclose the following information in its online 26    privacy policy or policies if the business has an online   SB0052- 51 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    privacy police or policies and in any State-specific 2    description of consumer privacy rights, or if the business 3    does not maintain those policies, on its Internet website 4    and update that information at least once every 12 months:5            (A) a description of a consumer's rights under 6        Sections 10-5, 10-10, 10-15, 10-20, 10-25, and 10-45 7        and 2 more designated methods for submitting requests, 8        except as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph 9        (1) of subsection (a);10            (B) for purposes of subsection (c) of Section 11        10-20:12                (i) a list of categories of personal 13            information it has collected about consumers in 14            the preceding 12 months by reference to the 15            enumerated category or categories in subsection 16            (c) that most closely describe the personal 17            information collected;18                (ii) the categories of sources from which 19            personal information is collected;20                (iii) the business or commercial purpose for 21            collecting, selling, or sharing personal 22            information; and23                (iv) the categories of third parties to whom 24            the business discloses personal information; and25            (C) for purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2) of 26        subsection (c) of Section 10-25, 2 separate lists:  SB0052- 52 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1                (i) a list of categories of personal 2            information it has sold or shared about consumers 3            in the preceding 12 months by reference to the 4            enumerated category or categories in subsection 5            (c) that most closely describe the personal 6            information sold or shared, or if the business has 7            not sold or shared personal information in the 8            preceding 12 months, the business shall 9            prominently disclose that fact in its privacy 10            policy; and11                (ii) a list of the categories of personal 12            information it has disclosed about consumers for a 13            business purpose in the preceding 12 months by 14            reference to the enumerated category or categories 15            in subsection (c) that most closely describes the 16            personal information disclosed, or if the business 17            has not disclosed personal information in the 18            preceding 12 months, the business shall disclose 19            that fact;20        (7) ensure that all individuals responsible for 21    handling consumer inquiries about the business' privacy 22    practices or the business' compliance with this Act are 23    informed of all requirements in Sections 10-5, 10-10, 24    10-15, 10-20, 10-25, and 10-45 and this Section, and how 25    to direct consumers to exercise their rights under those 26    Sections; and  SB0052- 53 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        (8) use any personal information collected from the 2    consumer in connection with the business' verification of 3    the consumer's request solely for the purposes of 4    verification and shall not further disclose the personal 5    information, retain it longer than necessary for purposes 6    of verification, or use it for unrelated purposes.7    (b) A business is not obligated to provide the information 8required by Sections 10-20 and 10-25 to the same consumer more 9than twice in a 12-month period.10    (c) The categories of personal information required to be 11disclosed under Sections 10-5, 10-20, and 10-25 shall follow 12the definitions of personal information and sensitive personal 13information by describing the categories of personal 14information using the specific terms set forth in the 15definition of personal information and by describing the 16categories of sensitive personal information using the 17specific terms set forth in the definition of sensitive 18personal information. 19    Section 10-50. Methods of limiting sale, sharing, and use 20of personal information and use of sensitive personal 21information.22    (a) A business that is sells or shares personal 23information or discloses sensitive personal information for 24purposes other than those authorized by subsection (a) of 25Section 10-35 shall, in a form that is reasonably accessible   SB0052- 54 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1to consumers:2        (1) provide a clear and conspicuous link on the 3    business's Internet homepage titled "Do Not Sell or Share 4    My Personal Information" to an Internet webpage that 5    enables a consumer, or a person authorized by the 6    consumer, to opt out of the sale or sharing of the personal 7    information;8        (2) provide a clear and conspicuous link on the 9    business's Internet homepage titled "Limit the Use of My 10    Sensitive Personal Information" that enables a consumer, 11    or a person authorized by the consumer, to limit the use or 12    disclosure of the sensitive personal information;13        (3) at the business's discretion, use a single, 14    clearly labeled link on the business's Internet homepage, 15    in lieu of complying with paragraphs (1) and (2), if that 16    link easily allows a consumer to opt out of the sale or 17    sharing of the personal information and to limit the use 18    or disclosure of the sensitive personal information; and19        (4) if the business responds to opt-out requests 20    received under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) by informing the 21    consumer of a charge for the use of any product or service, 22    present the terms of any financial incentive offered under 23    subsection (b) of Section 10-40, for the retention, use, 24    sale, or sharing of the personal information or sensitive 25    personal information.26    (b) A business shall not be required to comply with   SB0052- 55 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1subsection (a) if the business allows consumers to opt out of 2the sale or sharing of personal information or limit the use of 3sensitive personal information through an opt-out preference 4signal sent with the consumer's consent by a platform, 5technology, or mechanism, based on technical specifications 6set forth by rules, to the business indicating the consumer's 7intent to opt out of the business's sale or sharing of the 8personal information or to limit the use or disclosure of the 9sensitive personal information, or both.10    A business that allows consumers to opt out of the sale or 11sharing of their personal information and to limit the use of 12sensitive personal information under this subsection may 13provide a link to a webpage that enables the consumer to 14consent to the business ignoring the opt-out preference signal 15with respect to that business's sale or sharing of the 16personal information or the use of the sensitive personal 17information for additional purposes if:18            (1) the consent webpage also allows the consumer 19        or a person authorized by the consumer to revoke the 20        consent as easily as it affirmatively provided;21            (2) the link to the webpage does not degrade the 22        consumer's experience on the webpage the consumer 23        intends to visit and has a similar look, feel, and size 24        relative to other links on the same webpage; and25            (3) the consent webpage complies with technical 26        specifications set forth by rules.  SB0052- 56 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    A business that complies with subsection (a) is not 2required to comply with subsection (b). A business may elect 3whether to comply with subsection (a) or (b).4    (c) A business that is subject to this Section shall:5        (1) not require a consumer to create an account or 6    provide additional information beyond what is necessary in 7    order to direct the business not to sell or share the 8    personal information or to limit use or disclosure of the 9    sensitive personal information;10        (2) include a description of a consumer's rights under 11    Sections 10-30 and 10-35, along with a separate link to 12    the "Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information" 13    Internet webpage and a separate link to the "Limit the Use 14    of My Sensitive Personal Information" Internet webpage, if 15    applicable, or a single link to both choices, or a 16    statement that the business responds to and abides by 17    opt-out preference signals sent by a platform, technology, 18    or mechanism in accordance with subsection (b), in:19            (A) its online privacy policy or policies if the 20        business has an online privacy policy or policies; and21            (B) any State-specific description of consumers' 22        privacy rights;23        (3) ensure that all individuals responsible for 24    handling consumer inquiries about the business's privacy 25    practices or the business's compliance with this Act are 26    informed of all requirements in Sections 10-30 and 10-35   SB0052- 57 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    and this Section and how to direct consumers to exercise 2    their rights under those Sections;3        (4) for consumers who exercise their right to opt out 4    of the sale or sharing of their personal information or 5    limit the use or disclosure of their sensitive personal 6    information, refrain from selling or sharing the personal 7    information or using or disclosing the sensitive personal 8    information and wait for at least 12 months before 9    requesting that the consumer authorize the sale or sharing 10    of the personal information or the use and disclosure of 11    the sensitive personal information for additional 12    purposes, or as authorized by rules;13        (5) for consumers under 16 years of age who do not 14    consent to the sale or sharing of their personal 15    information, refrain from selling or sharing the personal 16    information of the consumer under 16 years of age and wait 17    for at least 12 months before requesting the consumer's 18    consent again, or as authorized by rules or until the 19    consumer attains 16 years of age; and20        (6) use any personal information collected from the 21    consumer in connection with the submission of the 22    consumer's opt-out request solely for the purposes of 23    complying with the opt-out request.24    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require a 25business to comply with the Act by including the required 26links and text on the homepage that the business makes   SB0052- 58 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1available to the public generally, if the business maintains a 2separate and additional homepage that is dedicated to State 3consumers and that includes the required links and text, and 4the business takes reasonable steps to ensure that State 5consumers are directed to the homepage for State consumers and 6not the homepage made available to the public generally.7    (e) A consumer may authorize another person to opt out of 8the sale or sharing of the personal information and to limit 9the use of the sensitive personal information on the 10consumer's behalf, including through an opt-out preference 11signal, indicating the consumer's intent to opt out, and a 12business shall comply with an opt-out request received from a 13person authorized by the consumer to act on the consumer's 14behalf, under the rules adopted by the Attorney General, 15regardless of whether the business has elected to comply with 16subsection (a) or (b). A business that elects to comply with 17subsection (a) may respond to the consumer's opt-out request 18consistent with Section 10-40.19    (f) If a business communicates a consumer's opt-out 20request to any persona authorized by the business to collect 21personal information, the person shall thereafter only use 22that personal information for a business purpose specified by 23the business, or as otherwise permitted by this Act, and shall 24be prohibited from:25        (1) selling or sharing that personal information; or26        (2) retaining, using, or disclosing that personal   SB0052- 59 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    information:2            (A) for any purpose other than for the specific 3        purpose of performing the services offered to the 4        business;5            (B) outside of the direct business relationship 6        between the person and the business; or7            (C) for a commercial purpose other than providing 8        the services to the business.9    (g) A business that communicates a consumer's opt-out 10request to a person under subsection (f) shall not be liable 11under this Act if the person receiving the opt-out request 12violates the restrictions set forth in the Act, if, at the time 13of communicating the opt-out request, the business does not 14have actual knowledge, or reason to believe, that the person 15intends to commit such a violation. Any provision of a 16contract or agreement of any kind that purports to waive or 17limit this subsection in any way shall be void and 18unenforceable. 19    Section 10-55. Exemptions.20    (a) The obligations imposed on a business by this Act 21shall not restrict a business's ability to:22        (1) comply with federal, State, or local laws or 23    comply with a court order or subpoena to provide 24    information;25        (2) comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory   SB0052- 60 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, 2    State, or local authorities. Law enforcement agencies, 3    including police and sheriff's departments, may direct a 4    business under a law enforcement agency-approved 5    investigation with an active case number not to delete 6    personal information, and upon receipt of that direction, 7    a business shall not delete the personal information for 8    90 days in order to allow the law enforcement agency to 9    obtain a court-issued subpoena, order, or warrant to 10    obtain that personal information. For good cause and only 11    to the extent necessary for investigatory purposes, a law 12    enforcement agency may direct a business not to delete the 13    personal information for additional 90-day periods. A 14    business that has received direction from a law 15    enforcement agency not to delete the personal information 16    of a consumer who has requested deletion of the personal 17    information shall not use the personal information for any 18    purpose other than retaining it to produce to law 19    enforcement in response to a court-issued subpoena, order, 20    or warrant unless the deletion request is subject to an 21    exemption from deletion under this Act; 22        (3) cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning 23    conduct or activity that the business, service provider, 24    or third party reasonably and in good faith believes may 25    violate federal, State, or local law;26        (4) cooperate with a government agency request for   SB0052- 61 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    emergency access to personal information if a natural 2    person is at risk or danger of death or serious physical 3    injury if:4            (A) the request is approved by a high-ranking 5        government agency officer for emergency access to 6        personal information;7            (B) the request is based on the government 8        agency's good faith determination that it has a lawful 9        basis to access the personal information on a 10        nonemergency basis; and11            (C) the government agency agrees to petition a 12        court for an appropriate order within 3 days and to 13        destroy the personal information if that order is not 14        granted;15        (5) exercise or defend legal claims;16        (6) collect, use, retain, sell, share, or disclose 17    personal information that is deidentified or aggregate 18    consumer information; or19        (7) collect, sell, or share personal information if 20    every aspect of that commercial conduct takes place wholly 21    outside of the State. Commercial conduct takes place 22    wholly outside of the State if the business collected that 23    information while the consumer was outside of the State, 24    no part of the sale of the personal information occurred 25    in the State, and no personal information collected while 26    the consumer was in the State is sold. This paragraph   SB0052- 62 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    shall not prohibit a business from storing, including on a 2    device, personal information about a consumer when the 3    consumer is in the State and then collecting that personal 4    information when the consumer and stored personal 5    information is outside of the State.6    (b) The obligations imposed on businesses by Sections 710-20, 10-25, 10-30, 10-35, 10-45, and 10-50 shall not apply 8where compliance by the business with the Act would violate an 9evidentiary privilege under State law and shall not prevent a 10business from providing the personal information of a consumer 11to a person covered by an evidentiary privilege under State 12law as part of a privileged communication. 13    (c) This Act shall not apply to:14        (1) medical information governed by the Medical 15    Patient Rights Act or protected health information that is 16    collected by a covered entity or business associate 17    governed by the privacy, security, and breach notification 18    rules issued by the United States Department of Health and 19    Human Services, Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code 20    of Federal Regulations;21        (2) a provider of health care governed by the Medical 22    Patient Rights Act or a covered entity governed by the 23    privacy, security, and breach notification rules issued by 24    the United States Department of Health and Human Services, 25    Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal 26    Regulations to the extent the provider or covered entity   SB0052- 63 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    maintains patient information in the same manner as 2    medical information or protected health information as 3    described in paragraph (1); or4        (3) personal information collected as part of a 5    clinical trial or other biomedical research study subject 6    to or conducted in accordance with the Federal Policy for 7    the Protection of Human Subjects under good clinical 8    practice guidelines issued by the International Council 9    for Harmonisation or under human subject protection 10    requirements of the United States Food and Drug 11    Administration, as long as the information is not sold or 12    shared in a manner not permitted by this paragraph, and if 13    it is inconsistent, that participants be informed of that 14    use and provide consent.15    (d) This Act applies to an activity involving the 16collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication, or 17use of any personal information bearing on a consumer's credit 18worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, 19general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of 20living by a consumer reporting agency, as defined in 21subsection (f) of Section 1681a of Title 15 of the United 22States Code, by a furnisher of information, as set forth in 23Section 1681s-2 of Title 15 of the United States Code, who 24provides information for use in a consumer report, as defined 25in subsection (d) of Section 1681a of Title 15 of the United 26States Code, and by a user of a consumer report, as set forth   SB0052- 64 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1in Section 1681b of Title 15 of the United States Code.2    This subsection applies only to the extent that such 3activity involving the collection, maintenance, disclosure, 4sale, communication, or use of such information by the 5consumer reporting agency, furnisher, or user is subject to 6regulation under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act and the 7information is not collected, maintained, used, communicated, 8disclosed, or sold except as authorized by the federal Fair 9Credit Reporting Act.10    This subsection shall not apply to Section 10-60. 11    (e) This Act shall not apply to personal information 12collected, processed, sold, or disclosed under the federal 13Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act or the federal Farm Credit Act of 1971. 14This subsection shall not apply to Section 10-60.15    (f) This Act shall not apply to personal information 16collected, processed, sold, or disclosed under the federal 17Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994. This subsection shall 18not apply to Section 10-60. 19    (g) Section 10-30 shall not apply to vehicle information 20or ownership information retained or shared between a new 21motor vehicle dealer and the vehicle's manufacturer, if the 22vehicle or ownership information is shared for the purpose of 23effectuating, or in anticipation of effectuating, a vehicle 24repair covered by a vehicle warranty or a recall conducted 25under Sections 30118 through 30120 of Title 49 of the United 26States Code, as long as the new motor vehicle dealer or vehicle   SB0052- 65 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1manufacturer with which that vehicle information or ownership 2information is shared does not sell, share, or use that 3information for any other purpose. 4    (h) Notwithstanding a business's obligations to respond to 5and honor consumer rights requests under this Act: 6        (1) a period for a business to respond to a consumer 7    for any verifiable consumer request may be extended by up 8    to a total of 90 additional days where necessary, taking 9    into account the complexity and number of the requests. 10    The business shall inform the consumer of any such 11    extension within 45 days of receipt of the request, 12    together with the reasons for the delay;13        (2) if the business does not take action on the 14    request of the consumer, the business shall inform the 15    consumer, without delay and, at the latest, within the 16    time permitted of response by this subsection, of the 17    reasons for not taking action and any rights the consumer 18    may have to appeal the decision to the business; and19        (3) if requests from a consumer are manifestly 20    unfounded or excessive, in particular because of their 21    repetitive character, a business may either charge a 22    reasonable fee, taking into account the administrative 23    costs of providing the information or communication or 24    taking the action requested, or refuse to act on the 25    request and notify the consumer of the reason for refusing 26    the request. The business shall bear the burden of   SB0052- 66 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    demonstrating that any verifiable consumer request is 2    manifestly unfounded or excessive.3    (i)(1) A business that discloses personal information to a 4service provider or contractor in compliance with this Act 5shall not be liable under this Act if the service provider or 6contractor receiving the personal information uses it in 7violation of the restrictions set forth in this Act, and if, at 8the time of disclosing the personal information, the business 9does not have actual knowledge, or reason to believe, that the 10service provider or contractor intends to commit such a 11violation. A service provider or contractor shall not be 12liable under this Act for the obligations of a business for 13which it provides services as set forth in this Act. The 14service provider or contractor shall be liable for its own 15violations of this Act.16    (2) A business that discloses personal information of a 17consumer, with the exception of consumers who have exercised 18their right to opt out of the sale or sharing of their personal 19information, consumers who have limited the use or disclosure 20of their sensitive personal information, and minor consumers 21who have not opted-in to the collection or sale of their 22personal information, to a third party under a written 23contract that requires the third party to provide the same 24level of protection of the consumer's rights under this Act as 25provided by the business shall not be liable under this Act if 26the third party receiving the personal information uses it in   SB0052- 67 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1violation of the restrictions set forth in this Act, and if, at 2the time of disclosing the personal information, the business 3does not have actual knowledge, or reason to believe, that the 4third party intends to commit such a violation. 5    (j) This Act shall not be construed to require a business, 6service provider, or contractor to:7        (1) reidentify or otherwise link information that, in 8    the ordinary course of business, is not maintained in a 9    manner that would be considered personal information;10        (2) retain any personal information about a consumer 11    if, in the ordinary course of business, that information 12    about the consumer would not be retained; or13        (3) maintain information in identifiable, linkable, or 14    associable form, or collect, obtain, retain, or access any 15    data or technology, in order to be capable of linking or 16    associating a verifiable consumer request with personal 17    information.18    (k) The rights afforded to consumers and the obligations 19imposed on the business in this Act shall not adversely affect 20the rights and freedoms of other natural persons. A verifiable 21consumer request for specific pieces of personal information, 22to delete personal information, or to correct inaccurate 23personal information shall not extend to personal information 24about the consumer that belongs to, or the business maintains 25on behalf of, another natural person. A business may rely on 26representations made in a verifiable consumer request as to   SB0052- 68 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1rights with respect to personal information and is under no 2legal requirement to seek out other persons that may have or 3claim to have rights to personal information, and a business 4is under no legal obligation under this Act or any other 5provision of law to take any action under this Act if there is 6a dispute between or among persons claiming rights to personal 7information in the business' possession. 8    (l) The rights afforded to consumers and the obligations 9imposed on businesses under this Act shall not apply to the 10extent that they infringe on the noncommercial activities of a 11person or entity described in Section 4 of Article I of the 12Illinois Constitution. 13    (m) This Act shall not apply to:14        (1) personal information that is collected by a 15    business about a natural person in the course of the 16    natural person acting as a job applicant to, employee of, 17    owner of, director of, officer of, medical staff member 18    of, or independent contractor of that business to the 19    extent that the natural person's personal information is 20    collected and used by the business solely within the 21    context of the natural person's role or former role as a 22    job applicant to, an employee of, owner of, director of, 23    officer of, medical staff member of, or an independent 24    contractor of, that business;25        (2) personal information that is collected by a 26    business that is emergency contact information of the   SB0052- 69 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    natural person acting as a job applicant to, employee of, 2    owner of, director of, officer of, medical staff member 3    of, or independent contractor of that business to the 4    extent that the personal information is collected and used 5    solely within the context of having an emergency contact 6    on file; or7        (3) personal information that is necessary for the 8    business to retain to administer benefits for another 9    natural person relating to the natural person acting as a 10    job applicant to, employee of, owner of, director of, 11    officer of, medical staff member of, or independent 12    contractor of that business to the extent that the 13    personal information is collected and used solely within 14    the context of administering those benefits. 15    This subsection shall not apply to subsection (a) of 16Section 10-5 or 10-60.17    This subsection shall become inoperative on January 1, 182027.19    (n) The obligations imposed on businesses by Sections 2010-5, 10-10, 10-15, 10-20, 10-25, 10-35, 10-45, and 10-50 21shall not apply to personal information reflecting a written 22or verbal communication or a transaction between the business 23and the consumer, where the consumer is a natural person who 24acted or is acting as an employee, owner, director, officer, 25or independent contractor of a company, partnership, sole 26proprietorship, nonprofit, or government agency and whose   SB0052- 70 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1communications or transaction with the business occur solely 2within the context of the business conducting due diligence 3regarding, or providing or receiving a product or service to 4or from such company, partnership, sole proprietorship, 5nonprofit, or government agency.6    This subsection shall become inoperative on January 1, 72027.8    (o) Sections 10-10 and 10-30 shall not apply to a 9commercial credit reporting agency's collection, processing, 10sale, or disclosure of business controller information to the 11extent the commercial credit reporting agency uses the 12business controller information solely to identify the 13relationship of a consumer to a business that the consumer 14owns or contact the consumer only in the consumer's role as the 15owner, director, officer, or management employee of the 16business.17    (p) The obligations imposed on businesses in Sections 1810-10, 10-15, 10-20, and 10-25 shall not apply to household 19data. 20    (q) This Act does not require a business to comply with a 21verifiable consumer request to delete personal information to 22the extent the verifiable consumer request applies to a 23student's grades, educational scores, or educational test 24results that the business holds on behalf of a local 25educational agency at which the student is currently enrolled. 26If a business does not comply with a request under this   SB0052- 71 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1Section, it shall notify the consumer that it is acting under 2this exception. 3    This Act does not require, in response to a request under 4Section 10-20, that a business disclose an educational 5standardized assessment or educational assessment or a 6consumer's specific responses to the educational standardized 7assessment or educational assessment if consumer access, 8possession, or control would jeopardize the validity and 9reliability of that educational standardized assessment or 10educational assessment. If a business does not comply with a 11request under this Section, it shall notify the consumer that 12it is acting under this exception. 13    (r) Sections 10-10 and 10-30 shall not apply to a 14business's use, disclosure, or sale of particular pieces of 15personal information if the consumer has consented to the 16business's use, disclosure, or sale of that personal 17information to produce a physical item, including a school 18yearbook containing the consumer's photograph, if: 19        (1) the business has incurred significant expense in 20    reliance on the consumer's consent;21        (2) compliance with the consumer's request to opt out 22    of the sale of the personal information or to delete the 23    personal information would not be commercially reasonable; 24    and25        (3) the business complies with the consumer's request 26    as soon as it is commercially reasonable to do so.    SB0052- 72 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    Section 10-60. Personal information security breaches.2    (a) Any consumer whose nonencrypted and nonredacted 3personal information or whose email address in combination 4with a password or security question and answer that would 5permit access to the account is subject to an unauthorized 6access and exfiltration, theft, or disclosure as a result of 7the business's violation of the duty to implement and maintain 8reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to 9the nature of the information to protect the personal 10information may institute a civil action for:11        (1) the recovery of damages in an amount not less than 12    $100 and not greater than $750 per consumer per incident 13    or actual damages, whichever is greater;14        (2) injunctive or declaratory relief; or15        (3) any other relief the court deems proper.16    In assessing the amount of statutory damages, the court 17shall consider any one or more of the relevant circumstances 18presented by any of the parties to the case, including, but not 19limited to, the nature and seriousness of the misconduct, the 20number of violations, the persistence of the misconduct, the 21length of time over which the misconduct occurred, the 22willfulness of the defendant's misconduct, and the defendant's 23assets, liabilities, and net worth.24    (b) Actions under this Section may be brought by a 25consumer if, prior to initiating any action against a business   SB0052- 73 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1for statutory damages on an individual or classwide basis, a 2consumer provides a business 30 days' written notice 3identifying the specific provisions of this Act the consumer 4alleges have been or are being violated. If a cure is possible 5and if, within the 30 days, the business actually cures the 6noticed violation and provides the consumer an express written 7statement that the violations have been cured and that no 8further violations shall occur, no action for individual 9statutory damages or classwide statutory damages may be 10initiated against the business. The implementation and 11maintenance of reasonable security procedures and practices 12following a breach does not constitute a cure with respect to 13that breach. No notice shall be required prior to an 14individual consumer initiating an action solely for actual 15pecuniary damages suffered as a result of the alleged 16violations of this Act. If a business continues to violate 17this Act in breach of the express written statement provided 18to the consumer under this Section, the consumer may initiate 19an action against the business to enforce the written 20statement and may pursue statutory damages for each breach of 21the express written statement, as well as any other violation 22of this Act that postdates the written statement.23    (c) The cause of action established by this Section shall 24apply only to violations as defined in subsection (a) and 25shall not be based on violations of any other Section of this 26Act. Nothing in this Act shall be interpreted to serve as the   SB0052- 74 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1basis for a private right of action under any other law. This 2shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or 3obligations imposed under other law or the United States or 4Illinois Constitution. 5    Section 10-65. Administrative enforcement.6    (a) Any business, service provider, contractor, or other 7person that violates this Act shall be subject to an 8injunction and liable for an administrative fine of not more 9than $2,500 for each violation or $7,500 for each intentional 10violation or violations involving the personal information of 11consumers whom the business, service provider, contractor, or 12other person has actual knowledge are under 16 years of age in 13an administrative enforcement action brought by the Agency.14    (b) Any administrative fine assessed for a violation of 15this Act, and the proceeds of any settlement of an action 16brought under subsection (a), shall be deposited into the 17Consumer Privacy Fund, with the intent to fully offset any 18costs incurred by the State courts, the Attorney General, and 19the Agency in connection with this Act. 20    Section 10-70. Consumer Privacy Fund.21    (a) A special fund to be known as the Consumer Privacy Fund 22is hereby created within the State treasury, and is available 23upon appropriation by the General Assembly first to offset any 24costs incurred by the State courts in connection with actions   SB0052- 75 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1brought to enforce this Act, the costs incurred by the 2Attorney General in carrying out the Attorney General's duties 3under this Act, and then for the purposes of establishing an 4investment fund in the State treasury, with any earnings or 5interest from the Fund to be deposited into the General 6Revenue Fund, and making grants to promote and protect 7consumer privacy, educate children in the area of online 8privacy, and fund cooperative programs with international law 9enforcement organizations to combat fraudulent activities with 10respect to consumer data breaches.11    (b) Funds transferred to the Consumer Privacy Fund shall 12be used exclusively as follows: 13        (1) to offset any costs incurred by the State courts 14    and the Attorney General in connection with this Act; and15        (2) after satisfying the obligations under paragraph 16    (1), the remaining funds shall be allocated each fiscal 17    year as follows: 18            (A) 91% shall be invested by the Treasurer in 19        financial assets with the goal of maximizing long term 20        yields consistent with a prudent level of risk. The 21        principal shall not be subject to transfer or 22        appropriation, as long as any interest and earnings 23        shall be transferred on an annual basis to the General 24        Revenue Fund for appropriation by the General Assembly 25        for General Revenue Fund purposes; and26            (B) 9% shall be made available to the Agency for   SB0052- 76 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        the purposes of making grants in this State, with 3% 2        allocated to the following grant recipients: 3                (i) nonprofit organizations to promote and 4            protect consumer privacy;5                (ii) nonprofit organizations and public 6            agencies, including school districts, to educate 7            children in the area of online privacy; and8                (iii) State and local law enforcement agencies 9            to fund cooperative programs with international 10            law enforcement organizations to combat fraudulent 11            activities with respect to consumer data breaches. 12    (c) Funds in the Consumer Privacy Fund shall not be 13subject to appropriation or transfer by the General Assembly 14for any other purpose. 15    Section 10-75. Rules.16    (a) By July 1, 2026, the Attorney General shall solicit 17broad public participation and adopt rules to further the 18purposes of this Act, including, but not limited to:19        (1) updating or adding categories of personal 20    information to the definition of personal information and 21    updating or adding categories of sensitive personal 22    information to the definition of sensitive personal 23    information in order to address changes in technology, 24    data collection practices, obstacles to implementation, 25    and privacy concerns;  SB0052- 77 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        (2) updating as needed the definitions of deidentified 2    and unique identifier to address changes in technology, 3    data collection, obstacles to implementation, and privacy 4    concerns and adding, modifying, or deleting categories to 5    the definition of designated methods for submitting 6    requests to facilitate a consumer's ability to obtain 7    information from a business under Section 10-45. The 8    authority to update the definition of deidentified shall 9    not apply to deidentification standards set forth in 10    Section 164.514 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal 11    Regulations;12        (3) establishing any exceptions necessary to comply 13    with State or federal law, including, but not limited to, 14    those relating to trade secrets and intellectual property 15    rights, within one year of the effective date of this Act 16    and as needed thereafter, with the intention that trade 17    secrets should not be disclosed in response to a 18    verifiable consumer request;19        (4) establishing rules and procedures:20            (A) to facilitate and govern the submission of a 21        request by a consumer to opt out of the sale or sharing 22        of personal information and to limit the use of 23        sensitive personal information to ensure that 24        consumers have the ability to exercise their choices 25        without undue burden and to prevent business from 26        engaging in deceptive or harassing conduct, including   SB0052- 78 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        in retaliation against consumers for exercising their 2        rights, while allowing businesses to inform consumers 3        of the consequences of their decision to opt out of the 4        sale or sharing of their personal information or to 5        limit the use of their sensitive personal information;6            (B) to govern business compliance with a 7        consumer's opt-out request; and8            (C) for the development and use of a recognizable 9        and uniform opt-out logo or button by all businesses 10        to promote consumer awareness of the opportunity to 11        opt out of the sale of personal information;12        (5) adjusting the monetary threshold in January of 13    every odd-numbered year to reflect any increase in the 14    Consumer Price Index, in the definition of business, 15    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 16    Section 10-60, subsection (a) of Section 10-65, Section 17    15-20, and subsection (a) of Section 15-85;18        (6) establishing rules, procedures, and any exceptions 19    necessary to ensure that the notices and information that 20    businesses are required to provide under this Act are 21    provided in a manner that may be easily understood by the 22    average consumer, are accessible to consumers with 23    disabilities, and are available in the language primarily 24    used to interact with the consumer, including establishing 25    rules and guidelines regarding financial incentives, 26    within one year of the effective date of this Act and as   SB0052- 79 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    needed thereafter;2        (7) establishing rules and procedures to further the 3    purposes of Sections 10-10, 10-15, 10-20, and 10-25 and to 4    facilitate a consumer's or the consumer's authorized 5    agent's ability to delete personal information, correct 6    inaccurate personal information, or obtain information, 7    with the goal of minimizing the administrative burden on a 8    consumer, taking into account available technology, 9    security concerns, and the burden on the business, to 10    govern a business's determination that a request for 11    information received from a consumer is a verifiable 12    consumer request, including treating a request submitted 13    through a password-protected account maintained by the 14    consumer with the business while the consumer is logged 15    into the account as a verifiable consumer request and 16    providing a mechanism for a consumer who does not maintain 17    an account with the business to request information 18    through the business's authentication of the consumer's 19    identity, within one year of the effective date of this 20    Act and as needed thereafter;21        (8) establishing how often, and under what 22    circumstances, a consumer may request a correction under 23    Section 10-15, including standards governing:24            (A) how a business responds to a request for 25        correction, including exceptions for requests to which 26        a response is impossible or would involve   SB0052- 80 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        disproportionate effort, and requests for correction 2        of accurate information;3            (B) how concerns regarding the accuracy of the 4        information may be resolved;5            (C) the steps a business may take to prevent 6        fraud; and7            (D) if a business rejects a request to correct 8        personal information collected and analyzed concerning 9        a consumer's health, the right of a consumer to 10        provide a written addendum to the business with 11        respect to any item or statement regarding any such 12        personal information that the consumer believes to be 13        incomplete or incorrect. The addendum shall be limited 14        to 250 words per alleged incomplete or incorrect item 15        and shall clearly indicate in writing that the 16        consumer requests the addendum to be made a part of the 17        consumer's record;18        (9) establishing the standard to govern a business's 19    determination that providing information beyond the 20    12-month period in a response to a verifiable consumer 21    request is impossible or would involve a disproportionate 22    effort;23        (10) issuing rules further defining and adding to the 24    business purposes, including other notified purposes, for 25    which businesses, service providers, and contractors may 26    use personal information consistent with consumers'   SB0052- 81 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    expectations, and further defining the business purposes 2    for which service providers and contractors may combine 3    personal information obtained from different sources, 4    except as provided for in the definition of business 5    purposes;6        (11) issuing rules identifying those business 7    purposes, including other notified purposes, for which 8    service providers and contractors may use consumers' 9    personal information received under a written contract 10    with a business, for the service provider or contractor's 11    own business purposes, with the goal of maximizing 12    consumer privacy; 13        (12) issuing rules to further define intentionally 14    interacts with the goal of maximizing consumer privacy;15        (13) issuing rules to further define precise 16    geolocation, including if the size defined is not 17    sufficient to protect consumer privacy in sparsely 18    populated areas or when the personal information is used 19    for normal operational purposes, including billing;20        (14) issuing rules to define specific pieces of 21    information obtained from the consumer with the goal of 22    maximizing a consumer's right to access relevant personal 23    information while minimizing the delivery of information 24    to a consumer that would not be useful to the consumer, 25    including system log information and other technical data. 26    For delivery of the most sensitive personal information,   SB0052- 82 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    the rules may require a higher standard of authentication 2    as long as the Agency shall monitor the impact of the 3    higher standard on the right of consumers to obtain their 4    personal information to ensure that the requirements of 5    verification do not result in the unreasonable denial of 6    verifiable consumer requests;7        (15) issuing rules requiring businesses whose 8    processing of personal information presents significant 9    risk to consumers' privacy or security, to: 10            (A) perform a cybersecurity audit on an annual 11        basis, including defining the scope of the audit and 12        establishing a process to ensure that audits are 13        thorough and independent. The factors to be considered 14        in determining when processing may result in 15        significant risk to the security of personal 16        information shall include the size and complexity of 17        the business and the nature and scope of processing 18        activities; and19            (B) submit to the Agency on a regular basis a risk 20        assessment with respect to their processing of 21        personal information, including whether the processing 22        involves sensitive personal information, and 23        identifying and weighing the benefits resulting from 24        the processing to the business, the consumer, other 25        stakeholders, and the public, against the potential 26        risks to the rights of the consumer associated with   SB0052- 83 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        that processing, with the goal of restricting or 2        prohibiting the processing if the risks to privacy of 3        the consumer outweigh the benefits resulting from 4        processing to the consumer, the business, other 5        stakeholders, and the public. Nothing in this Section 6        shall require a business to divulge trade secrets;7        (16) issuing rules governing access and opt-out rights 8    with respect to a business's use of automated 9    decision-making technology, including profiling and 10    requiring business's response to access requests to 11    include meaningful information about the logic involved in 12    those decision-making processes, as well as a description 13    of the likely outcome of the process with respect to the 14    consumer;15        (17) issuing rules to further define a law enforcement 16    agency-approved investigation for purposes of the 17    exception in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 18    10-55;19        (18) issuing rules to define the scope and process for 20    the exercise of the Agency's audit authority, to establish 21    criteria for selection of persons to audit, and to protect 22    consumers' personal information from disclosure to an 23    auditor in the absence of a court order, warrant, or 24    subpoena;25        (19) (A) issuing rules to define the requirements and 26    technical specifications for an opt-out preference signal   SB0052- 84 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    sent by a platform, technology, or mechanism, to indicate 2    a consumer's intent to opt out of the sale or sharing of 3    the personal information and to limit the use or 4    disclosure of the sensitive personal information. The 5    requirements and specifications for the opt-out preference 6    signal should be updated from time to time to reflect the 7    means by which consumers interact with businesses, and 8    should: 9            (i) ensure that the manufacturer of a platform or 10        browser or device that sends the opt-out preference 11        signal cannot unfairly disadvantage another business;12            (ii) ensure that the opt-out preference signal is 13        consumer-friendly, clearly described, and easy to use 14        by an average consumer and does not require that the 15        consumer provide additional information beyond what is 16        necessary;17            (iii) clearly represent a consumer's intent and be 18        free of defaults constraining or presupposing that 19        intent;20            (iv) ensure that the opt-out preference signal 21        does not conflict with other commonly used privacy 22        settings or tools that consumers may employ;23            (v) provide a mechanism for the consumer to 24        selectively consent to a business's sale of the 25        personal information or the use or disclosure of the 26        sensitive personal information without affecting the   SB0052- 85 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        consumer's preferences with respect to other 2        businesses or disabling the opt-out preference signal 3        globally; and4            (vi) state that in the case of a page or setting 5        view that the consumer accesses to set the opt-out 6        preference signal, the consumer should see up to 3 7        choices, including: 8                (I) a global opt-out from sale and sharing of 9            personal information, including a direction to 10            limit the use of sensitive personal information;11                (II) a choice to "Limit the Use of My 12            Sensitive Personal Information"; and13                (III) a choice to "Do Not Sell or Do Not Share 14            My Personal Information for Cross-Context 15            Behavioral Advertising";16        (B) issuing rules to establish technical 17    specifications for an opt-out preference signal that 18    allows the consumer, or the consumer's parent or guardian, 19    to specify that the consumer is less than 13 years of age 20    or at least 13 years of age and less than 16 years of age; 21    and22        (C) issuing rules, with the goal of strengthening 23    consumer privacy while considering the legitimate 24    operational interests of businesses, to govern the use or 25    disclosure of sensitive personal information, 26    notwithstanding the consumer's direction to limit the use   SB0052- 86 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    or disclosure of the sensitive personal information, 2    including: 3            (i) determining any additional purposes for which 4        a business may use or disclose sensitive personal 5        information;6            (ii) determining the scope of activities permitted 7        under the definition of business purposes, as 8        authorized by subsection (a) of Section 10-35, to 9        ensure that the activities do not involve 10        health-related research;11            (iii) ensuring the functionality of the business' 12        operations; and13            (iv) ensuring that the exemption in subsection (d) 14        of Section 10-35 for sensitive personal information 15        applies to sensitive personal information that is 16        collected or processed incidentally, or without the 17        purpose of inferring characteristics about a consumer, 18        while ensuring that businesses do not use the 19        exemption for the purpose of evading consumers' rights 20        to limit the use and disclosure of sensitive personal 21        information under Section 10-35;22        (20) issuing rules to govern how a business that has 23    elected to comply with subsection (b) of Section 10-50 24    responds to the opt-out preference signal and provides 25    consumers with the opportunity subsequently to consent to 26    the sale or sharing of their personal information or the   SB0052- 87 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    use and disclosure of their sensitive personal information 2    for purposes in addition to those authorized by subsection 3    (a) of Section 10-50. The rules should:4            (A) strive to promote competition and consumer 5        choice and be technology neutral;6            (B) ensure that the business does not respond to 7        an opt-out preference signal by: 8                (i) intentionally degrading the functionality 9            of the consumer experience;10                (ii) charging the consumer a fee in response 11            to the consumer's opt-out preferences;12                (iii) making any products or services not 13            function properly or fully for the consumer, as 14            compared to consumers who do not use the opt-out 15            preference signal;16                (iv) attempting to coerce the consumer to opt 17            in to the sale or sharing of the personal 18            information, or the use or disclosure of the 19            sensitive personal information, by stating or 20            implying that the use of the opt-out preference 21            signal will adversely affect the consumer as 22            compared to consumers who do not use the opt-out 23            preference signal, including stating or implying 24            that the consumer will not be able to use the 25            business' products or services or that those 26            products or services may not function properly or   SB0052- 88 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1            fully; and2                (v) displaying any notification or pop-up in 3            response to the consumer's opt-out preference 4            signal;5            (C) ensure that any link to a webpage or its 6        supporting content that allows the consumer to consent 7        to opt in: 8                (i) is not part of a pop-up, notice, banner, 9            or other intrusive design that obscures any part 10            of the webpage the consumer intended to visit from 11            full view or that interferes with or impedes in 12            any way the consumer's experience visiting or 13            browsing the webpage or website the consumer 14            intended to visit;15                (ii) does not require or imply that the 16            consumer must click the link to receive full 17            functionality of any products or services, 18            including the website;19                (iii) does not make use of any dark patterns; 20            and21                (iv) applies only to the business with which 22            the consumer intends to interact; and23            (D) strive to curb coercive or deceptive practices 24        in response to an opt-out preference signal but should 25        not unduly restrict businesses that are trying in good 26        faith to comply with Section 10-50;  SB0052- 89 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        (21) reviewing existing Illinois Insurance Code 2    provisions and rules relating to consumer privacy, except 3    those relating to insurance rates or pricing, to determine 4    whether any provisions of the Illinois Insurance Code 5    provide greater protection to consumers than the 6    provisions of this Act. Upon completing its review, the 7    Agency shall adopt a rule that applies only the more 8    protective provisions of this Act to insurance companies. 9    The Director of Insurance shall have jurisdiction over 10    insurance rates and pricing; and11        (22) harmonizing the rules governing opt-out 12    mechanisms, notices to consumers, and other operational 13    mechanisms in this Act to promote clarity and the 14    functionality of this Act for consumers. 15    (b) The Attorney General may adopt additional rules as 16necessary to further the purposes of this Act.17    (c) The Attorney General shall not bring an enforcement 18action under this Act until 6 months after the publication of 19the final rules adopted under this Section or July 1, 2026, 20whichever is sooner.21    (d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the timeline for 22adopting final rules required by the Act shall be July 1, 2026. 23Beginning the later of July 1, 2026, or 6 months after the 24Agency provides notice to the Attorney General that it is 25prepared to begin rulemaking under this Act, the authority 26assigned to the Attorney General to adopt rules under this   SB0052- 90 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1Section shall be exercised by the Agency. Notwithstanding any 2other law, civil and administrative enforcement of the 3provisions of law added or amended by this Act shall not 4commence until July 1, 2026, and shall only apply to 5violations occurring on or after that date. 6    Section 10-80. Anti-avoidance. A court or the Agency shall 7disregard the intermediate steps or transactions for purposes 8of effectuating the purposes of this Act:9        (1) if a series of steps or transactions were 10    component parts of a single transaction intended from the 11    beginning to be taken with the intention of avoiding the 12    reach of this Act, including the disclosure of personal 13    information by a business to a third party in order to 14    avoid the definition of sell or share; or15        (2) if steps or transactions were taken to purposely 16    avoid the definition of sell or share by eliminating any 17    monetary or other valuable consideration, including by 18    entering into contracts that do not include an exchange 19    for monetary or other valuable consideration, but where a 20    party is obtaining something of value or use. 21    Section 10-85. Waiver. Any provision of a contract or 22agreement of any kind, including a representative action 23waiver, that purports to waive or limit in any way a consumer's 24rights under this Act, including, but not limited to, any   SB0052- 91 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1right to a remedy or means of enforcement, shall be deemed 2contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable. 3This Section shall not prevent a consumer from declining to 4request personal information from a business, declining to opt 5out of a business's sale of the personal information, or 6authorizing a business to sell or share the personal 7information after previously opting-out. 8    Section 10-90. Good faith cooperation. The Agency, and any 9court, as applicable, shall consider the good faith 10cooperation of the business, service provider, contractor, or 11other person in determining the amount of any administrative 12fine or civil penalty for a violation of this Act. A business 13shall not be required by the Agency, a court, or otherwise to 14pay both an administrative fine and a civil penalty for the 15same violation.  16    Section 10-95. Remedies.17    (a) Any business, service provider, contractor, or other 18person that violates this Act shall be subject to an 19injunction and liable for a civil penalty of not more than 20$2,500 for each violation or $7,500 for each intentional 21violation and each violation involving the personal 22information of minor consumers, as adjusted by rule, which 23shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought by 24the Attorney General. The court may consider the good faith   SB0052- 92 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1cooperation of the business, service provider, contractor, or 2other person in determining the amount of the civil penalty. 3    (b) Any civil penalty recovered by an action brought by 4the Attorney General for a violation of this Act, and the 5proceeds of any settlement of any said action, shall be 6deposited into the Consumer Privacy Fund. 7    (c) The Agency shall, upon request by the Attorney 8General, stay an administrative action or investigation under 9this Act to permit the Attorney General to proceed with an 10investigation or civil action and shall not pursue an 11administrative action or investigation, unless the Attorney 12General subsequently determines not to pursue an investigation 13or civil action. The Agency may not limit the authority of the 14Attorney General to enforce this Act. 15    (d) No civil action may be filed by the Attorney General 16under this Section for any violation of this Act after the 17Agency has issued a decision under Section 15-80 or an order 18under Section 15-50 against that person for the same 19violation. 20    (e) This Section shall not affect the private right of 21action provided for in Section 10-60.  22Article 15. Privacy Protection Agency 23    Section 15-5. Establishment of Privacy Protection Agency.24    (a) There is hereby established the Privacy Protection   SB0052- 93 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1Agency, which is vested with full administrative power, 2authority, and jurisdiction to implement and enforce this Act. 3The Agency shall be governed by a 5-member board, including 4the chairperson. The chairperson and one member of the Board 5shall be appointed by the Governor. The Attorney General, 6President of the Senate, and Speaker of the House shall each 7appoint one member to the Board. These appointments should be 8made from among State residents with expertise in the areas of 9privacy, technology, and consumer rights.10    (b) The initial appointments to the Board shall be made 11within 90 days of the effective date of this Act. 12    Section 15-10. Member requirements. Members of the Board 13shall:14        (1) have qualifications, experience, and skills, in 15    particular in the areas of privacy and technology, 16    required to perform the duties of the Agency and exercise 17    its powers;18        (2) maintain the confidentiality of information which 19    has come to their knowledge in the course of the 20    performance of their tasks or exercise of their powers, 21    except to the extent that disclosure is required by the 22    Freedom of Information Act;23        (3) remain free from external influence, whether 24    direct or indirect, and shall neither seek nor take 25    instructions from another;  SB0052- 94 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        (4) refrain from any action incompatible with their 2    duties and engaging in any incompatible occupation, 3    whether gainful or not, during their term;4        (5) have the right of access to all information made 5    available by the Agency to the chairperson;6        (6) be precluded, for a period of one year after 7    leaving office, from accepting employment with a business 8    that was subject to an enforcement action or civil action 9    under this Act during the member's tenure or during the 10    5-year period preceding the member's appointment; and11        (7) be precluded for a period of 2 years after leaving 12    office from acting, for compensation, as an agent or 13    attorney for, or otherwise representing, any other person 14    in a matter pending before the Agency if the purpose is to 15    influence an action of the Agency.  16    Section 15-15. Terms. Members of the Board, including the 17chairperson, shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing 18authority but shall serve for no longer than 8 consecutive 19years. 20    Section 15-20. Compensation. For each day on which they 21engage in official duties, members of the Board shall be 22compensated at the rate of $100, adjusted biennially to 23reflect changes in the cost of living, and shall be reimbursed 24for expenses incurred in performance of their official duties.   SB0052- 95 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    Section 15-25. Executive director, officers, counsel, and 2employees. The Board shall appoint an executive director who 3shall act in accordance with Agency policies and rules and 4with applicable law. The Agency shall appoint and discharge 5officers, counsel, and employees, consistent with applicable 6civil service laws, and shall fix the compensation of 7employees and prescribe their duties. The Agency may contract 8for services that cannot be provided by its employees.  9    Section 15-30. Authority. The Board may delegate authority 10to the chairperson or the executive director to act in the name 11of the Agency between meetings of the Agency, except with 12respect to resolution of enforcement actions and rulemaking 13authority. 14    Section 15-35. Functions. The Agency shall perform the 15following functions: 16        (1) administer, implement, and enforce through 17    administrative actions this Act;18        (2) on and after the earlier of July 1, 2026, or within 19    6 months of the Agency providing the Attorney General with 20    notice that it is prepared to assume rulemaking 21    responsibilities under this Act, adopt, amend, and rescind 22    rules under Section 10-75 to carry out the purposes and 23    provisions of this Act, including rules specifying   SB0052- 96 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    recordkeeping requirements for businesses to ensure 2    compliance with this Act;3        (3) through the implementation of this Act, protect 4    the fundamental privacy rights of natural persons with 5    respect to the use of their personal information;6        (4) promote public awareness and understanding of the 7    risks, rules, responsibilities, safeguards, and rights in 8    relation to the collection, use, sale, and disclosure of 9    personal information, including the rights of minors with 10    respect to their own information, and provide a public 11    report summarizing the risk assessments filed with the 12    Agency while ensuring that data security is not 13    compromised;14        (5) provide guidance to consumers regarding their 15    rights under this Act;16        (6) provide guidance to businesses regarding their 17    duties and responsibilities under this Act and appoint a 18    Chief Privacy Auditor to conduct audits of businesses to 19    ensure compliance with this Act;20        (7) provide technical assistance and advice to the 21    General Assembly, upon request, with respect to 22    privacy-related legislation;23        (8) monitor relevant developments relating to the 24    protection of personal information and in particular, the 25    development of information and communication technologies 26    and commercial practices;  SB0052- 97 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1        (9) cooperate with other agencies with jurisdiction 2    over privacy laws and with data processing authorities in 3    this State, other states, territories, and countries to 4    ensure consistent application of privacy protections;5        (10) establish a mechanism under which persons doing 6    business in this State that do not meet the definition of 7    business may voluntarily certify that they are in 8    compliance with this Act, and make a list of those 9    entities available to the public;10        (11) solicit, review, and approve applications for 11    grants to the extent funds are available under paragraph 12    (2) of subsection (b) of Section 10-70; and13        (12) perform all other acts necessary or appropriate 14    in the exercise of its power, authority, and jurisdiction 15    and seek to balance the goals of strengthening consumer 16    privacy while giving attention to the impact on 17    businesses. 18    Section 15-40. Investigation of violations.19    (a) Upon the sworn complaint of any person or on its own 20initiative, the Agency may investigate possible violations of 21this Act relating to any business, service provider, 22contractor, or person. The Agency may decide not to 23investigate a complaint or decide to provide a business with a 24period to cure the alleged violation. In making a decision not 25to investigate or provide more time to cure, the Agency may   SB0052- 98 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1consider:2        (1) the lack of intent to violate this Act; and3        (2) the voluntary efforts undertaken by the business, 4    service provider, contractor, or person to cure the 5    alleged violation prior to being notified by the Agency of 6    the complaint. 7    (b) The Agency shall notify in writing the person who made 8the complaint of the action, if any, the Agency has taken or 9plans to take on the complaint, together with the reasons for 10that action or nonaction.  11    Section 15-45. Notice. No finding of probable cause to 12believe this Act has been violated shall be made by the Agency 13unless, at least 30 days prior to the Agency's consideration 14of the alleged violation, the business, service provider, 15contractor, or person alleged to have violated this Act is 16notified of the violation by service of process or registered 17mail with return receipt requested, provided with a summary of 18the evidence, and informed of their right to be present in 19person and represented by counsel at any proceeding of the 20Agency held for the purpose of considering whether probable 21cause exists for believing the person violated this Act. 22Notice to the alleged violator shall be deemed made on the date 23of service, the date the registered mail receipt is signed, or 24if the registered mail receipt is not signed, the date 25returned by the post office. A proceeding held for the purpose   SB0052- 99 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1of considering probable cause shall be private unless the 2alleged violator files with the Agency a written request that 3the proceeding be public.  4    Section 15-50. Procedure.5    (a) If the Agency determines there is probable cause for 6believing this Act has been violated, it shall hold a hearing 7to determine if a violation or violations have occurred. 8Notice shall be given and the hearing conducted in accordance 9with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The Agency 10shall have all the powers granted by that Act. If the Agency 11determines on the basis of the hearing conducted under this 12subsection that a violation or violations have occurred, it 13shall issue an order that may require the violator to do all or 14any of the following:15        (1) cease and desist violation of this Act; or16        (2) subject to Section 10-65, pay an administrative 17    fine of up to $2,500 for each violation, or up to $7,500 18    for each intentional violation and each violation 19    involving the personal information of minor consumers to 20    the Consumer Privacy Fund.21    If the Agency determines that no violation has occurred, 22it shall publish a declaration so stating.23    (b) If 2 or more persons are responsible for any violation 24or violations, they shall be jointly and severally liable.    SB0052- 100 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    Section 15-55. Rejection of administrative law decision. 2Whenever the Agency rejects the decision of an administrative 3law judge, the Agency shall state the reasons in writing for 4rejecting the decision.  5    Section 15-60. Subpoenas and evidence. The Agency may 6subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance and testimony, 7administer oaths and affirmations, take evidence and require 8by subpoena the production of any books, papers, records, or 9other items material to the performance of the Agency's duties 10or exercise of its powers, including, but not limited to, its 11power to audit a business's compliance with this Act. 12    Section 15-65. Limitations. No administrative action 13brought under this Act alleging a violation of any of the 14provisions of this Act shall be commenced more than 5 years 15after the date on which the violation occurred. 16        (1) The service of the probable cause hearing notice 17    upon the person alleged to have violated this Act shall 18    constitute the commencement of the administrative action. 19        (2) If the person alleged to have violated this Act 20    engages in the fraudulent concealment of the person's acts 21    or identity, the 5-year period shall be tolled for the 22    period of the concealment.23        (3) If, upon being ordered by a court to produce any 24    documents sought by a subpoena in any administrative   SB0052- 101 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    proceeding under this Act and the person alleged to have 2    violated this Act fails to produce documents in response 3    to the order by the date ordered to comply therewith, the 4    5-year period shall be tolled for the period of the delay 5    from the date of filing of the motion to compel until the 6    date the documents are produced. 7    Section 15-70. Collection of administrative fines.8    (a) In addition to any other available remedies, the 9Agency may bring a civil action and obtain a judgment in court 10for the purpose of collecting any unpaid administrative fines 11imposed under this Act after exhaustion of judicial review of 12the Agency's action. The venue for this action shall be in the 13county where the administrative fines were imposed by the 14Agency. In order to obtain a judgment in a proceeding under 15this Section, the Agency shall show, following the procedures 16and rules of evidence as applied in ordinary civil actions:17        (1) that the administrative fines were imposed 18    following the procedures set forth in this Act and 19    implementing rules;20        (2) that the defendant or defendants in the action 21    were notified, by actual or constructive notice, of the 22    imposition of the administrative fines; and23        (3) that a demand for payment has been made by the 24    Agency and full payment has not been received. 25    (b) A civil action brought under subsection (a) shall be   SB0052- 102 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1commenced within 4 years after the date on which the 2administrative fines were imposed.  3    Section 15-75. Judgment.4    (a) If the time for judicial review of a final Agency order 5or decision has lapsed, or if all means of judicial review of 6the order or decision have been exhausted, the Agency may 7apply to the clerk of the court for a judgment to collect the 8administrative fines imposed by the order or decision, or the 9order as modified in accordance with a decision on judicial 10review. 11    (b) The application, which shall include a certified copy 12of the order or decision, or the order as modified in 13accordance with a decision on judicial review, and proof of 14service of the order or decision, constitutes a sufficient 15showing to warrant issuance of the judgment to collect the 16administrative fines. The clerk of the court shall enter the 17judgment immediately in conformity with the application.18    (c) An application made under this Section shall be made 19to the clerk of the court in the county where the 20administrative fines were imposed by the Agency. 21    (d) A judgment entered in accordance with this Section has 22the same force and effect as, and is subject to all the 23provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action and 24may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the 25court in which it is entered.  SB0052- 103 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    (e) The Agency may bring an application under this Section 2only within 4 years after the date on which all means of 3judicial review of the order or decision have been exhausted. 4    (f) The remedies available under this Section are in 5addition to those available under any other law.  6    Section 15-80. Judicial review. Any decision of the Agency 7with respect to a complaint or administrative fine shall be 8subject to judicial review in an action brought by an 9interested party to the complaint or administrative fine and 10shall be subject to an abuse of discretion standard.  11Article 20. Miscellaneous 12    Section 20-5. Conflicting provisions. This Act is intended 13to further the constitutional right of privacy and to 14supplement existing laws relating to personal information. The 15provisions of this Act are not limited to information 16collected electronically or over the Internet, but apply to 17the collection and sale of all personal information collected 18by a business from consumers. Wherever possible, law relating 19to personal information should be construed to harmonize with 20the provisions of this Act, but if a conflict between other 21laws and the provisions of this Act, the provisions of the law 22that afford the greatest protection for the right of privacy 23for consumers shall control.    SB0052- 104 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    Section 20-10. Preemption. This Act is a matter of 2statewide concern and supersedes and preempts all rules, 3regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws adopted by a 4city, county, municipality, or local agency regarding the 5collection and sale of consumers' personal information by a 6business.  7    Section 20-15. Severability. The provisions of this Act 8are severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 9    Section 20-20. Standing. Notwithstanding any other 10provision of law, if the State or any of its officials fail to 11defend the constitutionality of this Act, any other 12governmental agency of this State shall have the authority to 13intervene in any court action challenging the 14constitutionality of this Act for the purpose of defending its 15constitutionality, whether that action is in State or federal 16trial court, on appeal, or on discretionary review by the 17Illinois Supreme Court or the Supreme Court of the United 18States. The reasonable fees and costs of defending the action 19shall be a charge on funds appropriated to the Office of the 20Attorney General, which shall be satisfied promptly. 21    Section 20-25. Construction. This Act shall be liberally 22construed to effectuate its purposes.   SB0052- 105 -LRB104 03756 JRC 13780 b1    Section 20-30. Saving clause. This Act is intended to 2supplement federal and State law, where permissible, but shall 3not apply if that application is preempted by, or in conflict 4with, federal law or the Illinois Constitution. The provisions 5of this Act relating to children under 16 years of age shall 6only apply to the extent not in conflict with the federal 7Children's Online Privacy Protection Act. 8Article 25. Amendatory Provisions 9    Section 25-5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 10Section 5.1030 as follows: 11    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)12    Sec. 5.1030. The Consumer Privacy Fund.